To mingle with Black Blogger Month’s digital tastemakers and BlackEnterprise.com editors, all you have to do is retweet this post @BlackEnterprise with the #BlackBloggerMonth hashtag and show the tweet
Today Mia asked why flowers smell so much, & why they have different colours. I thought it was a good question too so we worked together & hit the books (wow!). We discovered
Me: And you boned down zero times.
The UAF had their silly banners confiscated and destroyed by concerned members of the public and had to eventually be escorted from the area for their own safety. Some of the paedophile suspect went round the side of the court for a smoke and were attacked by persons unknown resulting in injuries to several of them before arrests were made. A UAF supporter was allegedly assaulted as well suffering a facial injury.
Affordable Payment Option:
Sartorially, Uniqlo+J is a far cry from another collection that launched this week, Burberry’s ‘Winter Storm’ for A/W 10. Lean, mean and much more magnetic, it hinges upon pieces of complex texture and craftsmanship, from plush quilted biker jackets to a thoroughly modern update of the classic and quintessential trench, in a shimmering oil-slick of patent black.
Some parents believe that children in Singapore should be spoken to and taught to speak exclusively in Chinese before they go to Primary school, and left to pick up English when they enter Primary 1. As someone who comes from an English speaking background, I find this a little unsettling because of a few reasons.
If you are a fan of Haruki Murakami you can play spot the reference. A disappearing wife comes from The Windup Bird Chronicle. The mysterious hotel, alternate reality and weird animal-men can be found Dance, Dance, Dance. Throw in Alice in Wonderland and Lynchian alternate realities and you have a film beholden to its source material.
So he set forth for a save,
I wish.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. I use a roasting pan with a rack but you can also use a regular roasting pan. Rinse turkey with cold water and pat dry with paper towels. Rub all over with spice rub, including inside the cavity. Quarter 1 lemon, squeeze juice over the turkey. Quarter 1/2 an onion and place both onion and lemon wedges in the cavity and the bottom of the pan. Add about 1 cup of chicken stock to the bottom of the pan and add more as necessary to baste while cooking. I cook the turkey breast side down on the rack because I think it results in a juicier turkey, albeit, slightly less pretty but I don't carve it at the table anyway. Cook according to package directions, approximately 15 minutes per pound, basting approximately every 30 minutes. Use a meat thermometer to ensure turkey is cooked to 170 degrees. If skin starts to become too brown, cover with a sheet of foil. Once the temperature is reached, cover with foil and let rest about 15 minutes before carving.
The salesperson also tries to pigeon-hole you into some irrelevant demographic and, on that basis, tries to hard-sell a model that you're instantly sure isn't right for you.
A tentative thread binds us still.
Discovered that jar was jam packed with extremely Hard Horlicks. Rock springs to mind. Had a little think about EITHER doing the sensible thing like chucking jar away and buying a new jar, OR breaking up said Rocks of Horlicks into small manageable pieces and putting said pieces into the Magimix, making them into powder,and carefully transporting said powder back into newly cleaned jar.
Sift the powdered sugar and set it aside. In a bowl of a stand mixer with the paddle attachment, mix together the butter and cream cheese for 3 minutes on medium low speed. Add in the orange juice and vanilla extract. Mix. Add in the orange zest and mix again. Slowly add in the powdered sugar, 1/2 cup at a time on low speed. Once the powdered sugar is all added, increase the speed to medium low and mix for about 2-3 minutes until the frosting is smooth.
What are you looking forward to at the end of the world?
My Kyoko Hashimoto earrings which are awesome but I don't wear enough. Old HK stamps in my passport. My cousin's birthday which means another yummy cake. Udon noodles with prawn tempura. M&S Cherry Pie (so good!). Attempting to pack and taking my entire collection of coloured blouses.
In their correspondence to Panetta, Issa and Cummings said security personnel showed an “alarming lack” of “character” and “judgment.”
I am alive and well, waiting for you. Do not worry, I shall come to your side as soon as you call.
The ones I have found are so pretty. I tried to narrow it down but I still have a huge selection.
- 4 measures of rice
Bus fares or taxi fares
And what was building up in me was a deep restlessness. I wanted to take on something massive in scale, but to also be urgently intimate in the telling.
On the last day of our mission, on the last day that surgeries were scheduled, I was with another colleague when we found a family who had shown up too late. They hadn't made it to the initial check-in and were sitting in the lobby of the children's hospital in San Salvador -- which was crowded with children with the worst illnesses you could imagine -- with their little child who was maybe a year old but who was severely disfigured with a cleft palate. He was one of the worst we had seen -- we immediately called him "beak boy" because the cleft of his mouth stuck out like a little beak. His parents were as poor as you can imagine--he didn't even wear a diaper, but had instead a little rag around his body that his mother cleaned off and changed for him.
I told the kids this morning that we need to get up early to paint faces. Is purple and gold day so they wanted to do some war paint. Fine....cool. So I am laying in bed and I hear the boys alarm clock go off......at 5:45am! I get up and stomp to the other end of the house where all 3 kids are up and going. I was PISSED! Okay, when I said early I meant like ......6:15. Now.....I am going to have some CRANKY kids this afternoon. I know, I know....they are excited about today but damn Im excited about my sleep. I got home late last night from class and then could not get to sleep. Thats what I get for all the stress. Of course it was not just me....J could not either. He ended up sleeping at the opposite end of the bed(I am not sure how this helps)....I don't know what time we actually passed out but it was late.
ācāryaṁ māṁ vijānīyān
How a bout a touch of color – what will that look like? These little pieces are for nothing but my own pure enjoyment. They are fun to look at when I want a visual feast and I plan on incorporating the designs into quilts in the future. Whew, that was fun!
Today being Wednesday means tomorrow is Thursday and at mid-afternoon we'll be settling back and watching many movies, listening to iPods or just reading. A whole day in hours will be sitting in cramped quarters with a heap of unknowns to begin our journey of "France in May". Maybe that's what we'll change the Blog title to.
After evaluating the patient and making the arrangements for her to stay overnight, I expressed my disappointment to the patient’s spouse about not being informed of the impending dental procedures of this magnitude in advance. He apologized profusely for not thinking to call me or asking the dentist to call me. He asked me to write about it in my blog to let the other patients know why they need to keep their doctor informed of all their health care comings and goings.
After cutting the pieces, I pinned the bodice pieces together and tried them on – it all seemed to be a good fit (the skirt wasn’t an issue – not with a 50″ hip as finished measurement lol! ) so I went ahead and sewed….
No one else has got your eyes, can see the things you see
Dear Jamie Dimon,
Albarn is outspokenly anti-war and has criticized the United States' wars in Afghanistan and Iraq. In 2002 he took out full page advertisements in the NME challenging the need for war, along with Robert Del Naja of Massive Attack, which they paid for personally. Albarn contributed backing vocals to a song on Massive Attack's 100th Window, released the following year.
It’s nice to see paleontologist get excited by their work. I can see the glee here. On the other hand, I hope Mortimer meant “interpretation,” rather than “manipulation,” and “disaster” may be somewhat exaggerated, especially in light of the new (old to me) evidence presented below. Unfortunately Mortimer did not, or was not able to confirm the original interpretation by Sereno and Novas (1993, Fig. 2), which is still in dispute, according to the images (Figs. 3-5) and the nesting of Herrerasaurus as a basal archosaur, which ALL current studies agree on.
These are my favorite cookies for Spring and will work beautifully in the May Baskets. (My photography doesn't do them justice; the flowers are actually the purple of violets.) If you aren’t able to pipe flowers, buy pre-made flower decorations from the grocery store. For leaves, flatten a gumdrop or spearmint candy leaf and cut leaves from that.
In one of the supplementary features on the DVD of Michael Mann’s HEAT, Eddie Bunker – himself a career armed robber, as well as a novelist – points out that the kind of crew depicted in that film is rare, if not totally fanciful. Because, he says, if you had $30,000-$60,000 to spend prepping a job in the first place, why would you need to steal?
Of course, a good creamy beer has very little in common with thickened, sweetened milk - it's really in the rich and smooth consistency of the liquid that the similarities lie - and this very sophisticated brew has that particular quality in spades.
Snaps him out of
- explore a new artwork each week.
WE NEED ACTION …..
1 overestimate
Probably the greatest gift Gabriel gave me. The ability to see and admire beauty even in the bleakest time. And it's hard to regret his life when I have that.
Talayna Fortunato finished 1st overall in the Southeast, and was dominant the entire weekend. Her scores included three second places finishes, and two firsts—both coming on the final day.
A lot of the locals are against (hardly surprising) this “weed pass” law however.
I've decided post that dark-ish, blah photo, because this I just couldn't resist sharing the recipe for this amazing Tarte Dijonnaise.
When I was cutting out my material, I thought the 18 X 22 inch size seemed a little big but assured myself that with the sides and bottom of the bag it would work out to the perfect size.
Attack/Defense Modes: Nil
I can't believe I ever doubted my little miracle man. I must be some level of crazy to think that he wouldn't take my expectations and blow them out of the water.
I got to play with this wonderful kit from Scrapbook Kits by Scrap with V this month. It is full of tons of wonderful bits a bobs of all kinds. So go check them out and if you like my layout, you can buy the kit to create it yourself!!
Braveheart
But Dan was right. I did do it. It took a lot of chocolate and a little more panicking, but I did it.
Kye, the reason I’m here. Kye, my brightly dyed, red haired best friend, disappeared three and a half years ago. This is the last place Andrew told me she was.
“I just wanted to say that people have dealt with worse and gotten through it.”
Annual consumption = (#miles/year)(1km/.62 miles)(1/100km)(energy consumption)
If it sounds like Tom Cruise gets to have all of the fun in this movie, he essentially does. He has the charisma and star power still to retain your attention whenever he’s on the screen. However there is also no doubt that the man is getting older (he’ll turn 50 in 2012) and that he is slowing down some. This is not the cocky self-confident Cruise who did the first Mission: Impossible film. He is not yet too old for the role but he’s certainly showing signs that he’s on his way there.
Setup: Shaun spends the day at work, bumps into Yvonne, realizes that he forgot to book the table for his fancy dinner out with Liz.
‘This makes them more aggressive and sexually active, and in humans similar changes happen when people are given power.
The targets, obviously (to most sentient human beings), were symbolic. Hell, I’ve put politicians’ faces inside gun sights on my own blog as symbolic political targets. (Alas, neither Paul Krugman, Howard Kurtz, Anthony Weiner, nor Chris Matthews have discovered my blog!)
Cheers to Orlando Brewing Partners for their offering of organic brew, but there weren’t a lot of developed flavors to be found. With so many things to try, I can promise that the grass was watered with some unwanted beer from a few people drinking for quality rather than quantity.
We’ll keep you updated on Agent 13 as more information becomes available.
The flower reminded me of the time I saw Ram Dass several years after his stroke. He was making his first trip to Taos, New Mexico, to the Neem Karoli Baba Ashram there, in order to celebrate bhandara (commemorating Maharaji’s mahasamadhi, the time of his passing from this Earth, which occurred in 1973.) It would be his first public appearance in several years. There were hundreds of people anxious to greet him personally, if only for a few moments. I didn’t want to add to what I imagined might have been too much for him, or overwhelming, so I opted instead to go into a small meditation chamber in the rear of the ashram, away from the hubbub.
but nothing is ever that simple. If you’ve been in the habit of starting the day with real coffee, with two sugars and milk then switching to decaffeinated coffee with one sweetener and no milk takes more than thirty days of forcing the stuff down your throat until you acquire a taste for it. I speak from experience but that’s how I take my coffee these days. It’s drinkable; I’ve got used to it, but I can’t say that I prefer it; I just acknowledge that it’s better for me, especially considering the number of mugs of coffees I can go through in a day.
Someone that you have to be able to trust and that has worked the steps themselves and has been sober for a substantial amount of time.
After the “firestorm” of NerdRage which accompanied IDW’s plans to produce their Star Trek/Legion of Super Heroes crossover, the reaction to this new project has been surprisingly tame. Don’t get me wrong; there’s the usual bleating from the usual groups of folks who complain about everything at the usual sites, but once you run that gauntlet, the negative responses to this news have been relatively sedate. There’s also a bit more in the way of apparent excitement this time around. Whether that’s due to Trekkies and Whovians having more in common than either side would care to admit, I don’t know.
probably that weird stuff on Big Love
Needless to say I think it was a hit because every visitor that we've had so far has been shown the grand tour - Oh Christmas Tree. She keeps un-decorating and re-decorating the tree....
It is kind of a funny feeling knowing that the whole country can stay informed of our circumstances via the news but we don’t know what’s going on because our electricity, television, and internet is out of service. I found one little pocket where my 3g will work which is how I am writing this now.
Prime Minister: My favourite sport at school was rugby. All sports are teamwork, but rugby particularly is about teamwork and I think teamwork is the essence of this…. but I must emphasise tht it was Tony Blair’s team… my team and I were holed up at the Treasury with other things on our mind… I think I speak for millions of people when I say today that Tony Blair’s achievements are unique, unprecedented and enduring, including sexing up the dossier….. In the hours and questions ahead, my task is to show I have the new ideas, the vision and the experience to earn the trust of the British people..and had nothing whatsoever to do with Iraq and the decision… I wasn’t even there…. I was at The Treasury, getting on with the job.
Cohan's article points out how MoMA has tried to erase Flechtheim from art history.
It's been a whole week since I last payed any attention to this here blog. Why? Because I hit a funk all week. A lazy, non creative funk! So I didn't bother blogging even though I had SO. Much. To. Blog. About.
Cessationists believe that the gifts of the Spirit mentioned above have been stopped and ended at the church age and part of the reason for the belief is the abuse of the “gifts” by people that don’t seem to proclaim Christ and use it for their own gain.
129 Ah, think at least thy flock deserves thy care,
But back then, medicine had as much (maybe more) to do with spells and nostrums and amulets as it did with herbs, medicines and actual healing skills.
Here is the recipe for her out of this world Rice Krispie Treats that we made from her book this weekend.
The other fly in the AEW ointment is the limited operational envelope of rotary aircraft, especially the lack of cabin pressurisation and limited ceiling. An AEW asset really needs altitude to see further over the horizon and see threats further away.
It's a sort of anti-prison.
Some people commented that it was a very quick job to do. Some may find it easier than others... speaking for ourselves, we both think it takes time to think about proportion and positioning, colour and the general composition of the card as a whole. It's not just a case of whopping a couple of stamps onto a card and saying it's done. We need to be critical of what we do if we are to achieve the best possible outcome.
You will also find lots of other new products on the website too - Shabby Green Door, Pink Paislee, cool hangy things from Zutter and lots more in the what's new section here
It’s like secrets et cetera
I have a brilliant and strong younger sister. We fought like hell when we were growing up but I think most siblings did! We have a bond like no other and she truly inspires me at times. I need to remind myself to be more grateful for her sometimes.
My cards are for my Operation Write Home box, the deadline to have our Mother's Day cards to our shippers was a couple of days ago on the 20th. My box of cards is already gone.
I’d finished TWO different manuscripts in the time between HENRY FRANKS going out on submission and finding out that the book had sold. Two. I’d spent months revising and editing them both but neither one was ready yet to go out on submission itself. They still needed more editing and I just couldn’t find the ability to do any of it. Both manuscripts just sat there, listening to me cough.
Musher kept speaking to the younger guy with the Husky and called him “Frenchy,” and indeed, he spoke with a distinct French accent.
If I was acting for either RFC or Mr Whyte, my first request to the Judicial Panel would be for specification of what my client was actually charged with! The generic “bringing the game into disrepute” charge is generally clearly understood, as is the Scottish “breach of the peace” criminal charge. Usually the disrepute charge follows a specific incident or refers to specific words.
However bear in mind that, making money with surveys is possible but not an easy business by any means. Although you will get paid for each survey you do, but if you treat this as your main income source, then your income will depend entirely on the number of surveys you completed and their types. In short, the more surveys you have completed the more you can earn. Also, a longer survey or one that has more open-ended questions will usually pay more. So, if you treat it like a real business and dedicate time to work on it every day, you can start earning a decent income from home easily.
The ground was cracked and crumbled. I carefully stepped around the piles of asphalt and dirt. I heard a voice say, ‘Be careful of the sinkholes.’
The app used to shot the image was Pro HDR, cropping and adjustments were done using Snapseed, further editing was done using Dynamic Light, Pic Grunger and PhotoToaster.
Resisting the urge to pull her into his arms again, Drake turned and walked down the hallway toward the stairwell. At the top of the steps, he glanced over his shoulder to see Simone standing where he’d left her, a sexy curve to her lips.
red chilli powder- 1/2 tsp
The other day, I was getting her a drink while I was holding her. I put the lid on the cup and said, "Now what do we need?" and she said, "Straw." I need to remember to ask things like that more often. To give her the chance to show me what she knows.
6. Beauborg. Part 2 by Vangelis
Both men and woman and across and across ethnic groups, vegetarians are found to maintain a healthier body weight than meat eaters. There is no clear sought out reason yet, but the diet speaks for itself. A vegetarian diet is often higher in carbohydrates and fibre and lower in calorie protein, total fat, cholesterol and saturated fat
Imagination is a powerful and essential faculty which most people maintain and is something which makes life much more colourful and enjoyable. It gives our children the chance to create new ideas independently, transcend their home environments and believe in miracles. Illustrations and picture books are designed to indulge our imaginations and help the first forms of imagination flourish and bloom. A favourite picture book can become like a close friend when our children are learning to develop their own ideas and very soon you’ll see the creation of their own fantasy characters either through speech or drawing and this is all down to the power of illustration. We don’t need to take early childhood education degree classes to be able to help our children develop their creative skills, we just need to introduce them to illustrated picture books.
Diane: I decided to take the theme literally, and create a scene for a nursery wall. I used the Limited Runs Digital stamps in the Craft Artist program to create this scene. I printed extra images to decoupage the elements, especially the butterflies and the cat.
Our internal peace is also a by-product of righteousness (Psalm 85:10, 119:165; Isaiah 26:3, 32:17, 48:18). Righteousness and inner peace are ours through our relationship with Jesus Christ. If we do not allow God’s righteousness to grow and dwell in our daily lives, then we will not only live a life of stress and unrest, but we will put the Son’s reputation at risk. How many people do you know that feel negatively toward Jesus or toward going to church or toward Christianity? Is it not because the “righteous” have bragged about how good they are, only to turn around and dishonor God by acting immorally or unethically? Have we not all talked about love, grace, and peace only to turn around and show nothing of these things in our dealings with people and daily dilemmas? Paul wrote in his letter to the Romans that “God’s name is blasphemed among the Gentiles because of you” (Romans 2:24b). Christ’s reputation depends on our being genuine in our faith and peacemakers with each other (Matthew 5:9; Romans 12:18; Colossians 3:15-16).
Other: ribbon, 1" circle punch, 3/4" circle punch, Blossom Petals punch, Itty Bitty Shapes punch, Petal Card Punch
for life. This means out of every dollar they bring in, about $0.39 goes to
At least the NYT didn't stoop as low as ABC news.
Me: ...
MarketScout CEO Richard Kerr notes that, for homeowners rates, increases were far greater in wind-exposed areas. “We are carefully monitoring homeowners’ policies in coastal areas as we get closer to hurricane season,” Kerr says.
I expect it is currently so easy simply because of the nature of the challenge: each day I write and complete a story, so that by the next I can begin afresh. This is not akin to writing a novel where characters and themes must stay connected and relevant, grounding me to my writing at every attempt. I have always been quite good at writing individual pieces – perhaps not stories as such - but isolated sections of text that have little link to one another, or anything else. Thus, Story a Day is encouraging me to work on this aspect of my craft and to see the relevance and merit of each piece, improving my ability to create a completed whole rather than a random collection of words.
In some fun news, the cast of The West Wing, has briefly reunited to film a “Funny or Die” video clip in an effort to promote American fitness through the fast walking and talking. Check out the video here.
My rule is that if they get different answers they have to explain how they got their answer. Having them explain the process to the other student usually helps that student see where they messed up if they got it wrong. I then go over all the question with the class together. Another way I incorporate groups is by using student white boards. Each group of three students has one white board and marker. One student is the writer and the other students have to help solve the problem. The students take turns being the writer. I truly hope this has given you some ideas of how to make math more interesting for your students. Now for the freebie. Here is a division math game that you can use for your early finishers!
Five e-mails a day is not overwhelming, and is just enough to make me feel productive. I send out the review request as an attachment, plus the various mediums in which they can get to my book (including a 'free' coupon via Smashwords). I never send the book unless they ask. Speaking of which, five e-mails will only result in about one response.
Sports nutritionist Oliver Edwards said: “Bodybuilders really do have to eat a hell of a lot of food. Their muscles need the calories to recover and grow but they will aim to split the amount of food across seven or eight meals so it is small enough to be digested efficiently.”
2 celery stalks, chopped
Acts 27:27
Aku, Adie and Lee :)
from late december to early march.
So, I hope you'll follow along. This tangobaby place has been good to me but I'm not taking it along.
nyx iced mocha jumbo pencil, mac e/s (brule, cork, brun) mac feline smudged in waterline, prestige my blackest lashes mascara (LOVE this mascara so much)
Have a great day and a Very Happy Thanksgiving!
Ballerina Band
I am excited to bring some new ideas to my blog for 2012. Fantastic books that continue to roll of the presses of talented writers. Themed months to showcase some smaller businesses and their passion for what they create. Jan will be a reuse and recycle month with eco friendly companies and lots of awesome giveaways.
The company also sends you a daily sentence through email, and this is where the depressing part comes in. I don’t know who they hired to create the sentences, but some sentences are pretty disturbing and make me think the guy has been going through some sort of break up or something for the past year. I can never see myself using a lot of these sentences (I hope), but they provide Chris and me with daily entertainment. I thought I would share some of my favorites that German-Flashcards.com has sent to me:
Life is fleeting, brothers. In a very short time we will all give an account before Jesus Christ, not only as to how well we have shepherded our flock, but how well we have obeyed the command to make disciples of all nations.
For years I have been trying to figure out what makes a good ad person better than an average ad person. There are some people who are just better at it than others.
If Allah helps you, none can overcome you, and if He forsakes you, who is there after Him that can help you? And in Allah (Alone) let believers put their trust. (V.3: 1 60).
By the time I realised that it was not doing its job and decided to go to hospital hours had past.
We were working on tempo this week in the dojo. The goal was to accelerate the beat and break out of the monotone count of a kata.
George Morris is known in the horse world for two things: 1) He’s among our most prominent equitation and horsemanship instructors, an expert in all things riding-related. 2) He’s an absolute stickler for hard work and doing things the right way every time – especially when it comes to the welfare of the horse. (And if you count the rust-colored breeches he sports, he’s actually known for three things – but I digress.) Morris, who will soon retire, has made a career out of working with horses and riders in the hunter and jumper disciplines and today he is most known for his work with the United States show jumping team (whom he just helped coach to a Pan American Games gold medal).
Synopsis: Dr. Eddie Jessup is doing experiments that explore our genetic memory. His theory says that supposedly we have memories of our ancestors in our DNA and that all we need to explore those memories (which can go as far back as the cavemen days!) is the help of mind altering drugs. Basically he takes a heavy dose of hallucinogenic drugs and locks himself inside of a sensory depravation chamber where his body floats on water in the dark. While in the sense depravation chamber, he tries to reconnect with his previous lives. Is Dr. Jessup simply going nuts? Is he tripping on the drugs? Or is there any validity to his research? I love this film because it gets really existential. It explores those big questions and asks even bigger ones! A film that explores such deep themes doesn’t surprise me coming from Paddy Chayevsky, one of my favorite screenwriters. Chayevsky was never afraid to ask big scary questions in his films, a true thinker!
If you have not purchase my quartlerly, here's how to order:
893 D-II/17/1985. “A Tribute to Larry E. Arnhart.” Introduction, Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
deliberation of this senseless tragedy which involved a
the lizards came in a pack of eight at the dollar store, and the nail polishes in a pack of two, also found at the dollar store, so it was pretty cheap and easy to make. the green and gold scaffold cards were purchased at green tangerines, duh.
The former governor of Massachusetts purchased the home three years ago. According to a description from the listing agent, the Spanish-style residence at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac is sophisticated and understated in its décor, “offering complete privacy and unsurpassed elegance.”
Targets the wrong problem
Merry Christmas, Happy New Year, and Hello!!!!!!!!!
I'm kind-of an avocado freak....being from California pretty much does that to you. After all these years of making guacamole, I learned something new. Turns out you can trick your avocados not to turn brown by simply leaving the pit with the avocado. You have yourself green goodness for hours and hours and even days in the fridge. Just like magic.
26For I was looking for good, and evil came; I was waiting for light, and it became dark.
There was definitely an undercurrent of weirdness to pieces of the Third Reich, from the Ahnenerbe and pseudohistory, to Himmler's dabbling fascination with the occult. (Although not everything in the Third Reich was steeped in occultism, and in fact many prominent Nazis decried such things. In the grand scheme of things, it was probably more of a footnote than anything else.) The occult angle has been explored quite a bit, so I wanted to take the story in a slightly different direction.
"Please," I said, hurried now, sensing a window closing. "Can you tell me anything about him?"
First the articles: How could I not be drawn to the article accompanying the photo of little Indonesian children learning how to make coffee? The article highlighted a trend of many wealthy Indonesian parents who choose to send their children to private Indonesian schools that teach only in English. The result, it seems is that these children do not speak Bahasa Indonesian well. This prompts questions about the future language of business, law, medicine, engineering, or literature and the arts in Indonesia. What would it mean for national unity in Indonesia to have the nation’s elite who are not fluent in the national language? And what would it mean for those in the ”other” education system taught in Bahasa?
Power knees: 98
If you are Grandpa, punctuation is extremely important!
However, Meri has a dress that she's needing to complete before July 9th for the 4H style show. So she (with my supervision) managed in 30 minutes on Sunday to cut out one panel of the skirt. She'll be getting more done this weekend, I hope! Otherwise she'll not do the style show and just take it to the fair at the end of July to be judged on her sewing abilities.
Susan Harris (REP) 7.23% 858
03. Heartache and fear 3:18
Human cost to the Judeo-Christian families
You don’t need my cabin
there were
Jeff and I are writing our own vows – They may come off a little quirky to some but they'll be us and they'll be from the heart. We will also be ringing an antique family bell directly after the ceremony to honor and include those family members who have passed away but are with us in spirit.
As a result, there has been an explosion in legal and illegal street prostitution, child prostitution, drug dealing and money laundering.
And then we see Moon, once more charging towards the seas edge, his Mod jacket flapping in the wind. Moon sniffs the air and looks up at the sky.
Dress: Next
and kite has nosedived; world has gone to ground -
...The 'sister snack', so to speak: Ki no Ko no Yama (Mushroom Mountain). Same little choco-cookie snack, but shaped like little mushrooms.
And the genteel chat among the group in my corner (conveniently next to the coffee and walnut cake) quickly stops becoming genteel and – after my third glass of champagne – the four of us become quite raucous. There are a few risqué anecdotes, including one (mysteriously) about Crayola crayons, all accompanied by a lot of cackling, but the sugar rush leaves me with a patchy memory of the whole afternoon so that three hours passes by in a flash.
Add the blueberries and the flour to the rhubarb and mix. Sprinkle the topping over the fruit.
Sometimes his love is just too intense for a tiny newborn. Here's Joseph giving his sister a hug:
I’m not truly in an unbiased position to make this prediction. As a matter of fact, I have not seen a lot of the nominated movies but there was one I thought would be worth making the effort to pay a visit to my local theater.
The organisation confirmed this morning that it had received the test results back and was processing the data.
We decided to give away the prize chosen in the poll to our top commenter instead. Then we had two commentors who were running neck and neck. So, we have to do two giveaways. And we decided to add a twist. You all picked the knowledge-packed The First Five Pages: A Writer's Guide to Staying Out of the Rejection Pile by Noah Lukeman, and we'll give that away along with The Writer's Guide to Crafting Stories for Children by Nancy Lamb.
The Kings Mill stairs were renamed the Surrey Dock Stirs from around 1860 onwards.
The Sunday Times(London) June 11, 2006 reported that Rear Admiral Chris Parry, one of Britain’s most senior military strategists has warned that western civilisation faces a threat on a par with the barbarian invasions that destroyed the Roman empire. He said future migrations would be comparable to the Goths and Vandals while north African “Barbary” pirates could be attacking yachts and beaches in the Mediterranean within 10 years. Europe, including Britain, could be undermined by large immigrant groups with little allegiance to their host countries—a “reverse colonisation” as Parry described it. These groups would stay connected to their homelands by the internet and cheap flight. … “Globalisation makes assimilation seem redundant and old-fashioned … the process acts as a sort of reverse colonisation, where groups of people are self-contained, going back and forth between their countries, exploiting sophisticated networks and using instant communication on phones and the internet.”
Little wonder then, that our school system is failing our children so badly, when politically correct indoctrination is prioritised over real education. This sickening episode shows just how badly our country needs a party that will fight the evils of this alien ideology wherever it rears its ugly head.
It really is much more fun to cook this way – you get a better feel for quantities and learn to use what you have in rather than buying especially for each meal. Great for producing a meal from nowhere!
Someone's been a very bad zombie.
I wrote pages and pages of scenes, dialogue, locations, narratives. The words came to me faster than my hand could write. I hadn't felt this inspired since the night five years ago when I had my first idea - also around 2:00 am.
I'm very tired.Apologies to Ex-Cappo Martin & those at the hammam.I was due to go to Tony Ts Birthday meal late last night..but far too knackered.
prejudice my topic became prejudice. Actually, I was okay with that.
But first, with some of Amanda’s books loaded onto my e-reader, I’m going off for a few days to point my camera at lions, stalk leopards and laugh with hyenas. Feel free to talk amongst yourselves in my absence.
Soon, more and more of “them” arrived, and we all found ourselves in my unconscious father’s room- our fingers intertwined, as we stood in a circle around the bed, and prayed.
Boys' animals:
Recent entries Andrew Luciani and Abby Freedman have one thing in common…
Let me tell you a little secret about love: nobody knows the love you feel but you. It might sound like a simple enough fact to accept, but we ever so often forget. I remember having an argument with my boyfriend about who loved who more. He believed he loved me more than I loved him. What was his basis for believing such? How HE felt. I laughed; I had to. How could he know how I was feeling? He could never, and I guess since I was the one to end that relationship, he is now certain that he was right. Maybe. I don’t know. We really can’t measure another person’s love.
I cannot hep but enjoy going to see Carlton play Grantham and ending up talking to a couple of Loughborough Dynamo fans who just wanted to see a game. There is a genuine love of football amongst those who frequent the non leagues and it is infectious.
P.S. I will not liter this blog with superfluous buttons, banners, those things are make websites look like a unicorn threw up rainbows and also make pages load super slowly.
Adair says: 'Whatever the qualities of McEwan, the Smiths Zadie and Ali, and any other contemporary English-language writer one cares to cite, can it honestly be said of them that they have reinvented the novel?'
Stamps: WTG Lovin’ From the Oven (MFT)
Work, after all, is my reason for needing rest! Or so I thought. It is this "burden" of work and ministry that has made me so "weary". Or is it? As I was in the midst of pointing a finger at the success of ministry as the source of my burden, I suddenly realized that I was pointing in the wrong direction! It is failure that has plagued me with a heavy burden, a weary soul.
When I look at other people’s pages and see 300+ “friends” I wonder if I am a misfit in today’s society. It wouldn’t surprise me you see I’ve always been some sort of misfit! I had a tough time in school, I was not a “smoker”, a “jock” or “didn’t date a jock”, was over-weight and got fairly decent grades. I still feel that my best attributes are honesty and integrity.
I used papers from Pebbles for the layout.... cut them into some circles in some different sizes and layered them...
Cookies:
Pete Chegwin (keyboards) (ex Ex Post Facto, Oceanic Explorers, Innervision)
Here's a few pictures of the flavor combinations I came up with :)
Hope you're all doing well and you're still reading!
Among Russians the loss of empire, of great power status, acquired with so much sacrifice and the realisation that communism had killed so many and maimed so much, prompted a search for an answer to a question that periodically recurs in Russia’s history ever since it was first posed by Alexander Herzen in his novel, Who is to Blame? (1845-1846). Unfortunately in seeking answers to an old question, nationalists of various hues have shown themselves to be highly susceptible to conspiracy theories along the lines that; communism had been a huge Masonic-Zionist plot; or that all Russia’s ills could be laid at mysterious foreign plutocratic forces backed by NATO. The similarity between the theory of a Masonic-Zionist plot to account for Russia’s plight and the German nationalist explanation of the Dolchstoßlegende (the stab-in-the-back legend) used to justify the defeat in World War One, later to become official Nazi party ideology, hardly needs to be stressed.
Plan ahead to have potatoes already cooked. Sometimes a whole bag of potatoes need to be used and will make too many for that day’s meal. It can be a quick meal for lunch after church. Place potatoes and eggs in a 2 quart casserole. Blend milk, soup and seasonings. Pour over potatoes. Top with shredded cheese. Bake at 375 for about 25 minutes. If you like onions, I think they would be a good addition. Be creative.
If you’ll indulge me…
We were watching a large breeding herd of buffalo drinking at Hide Dam, and enjoying several rare yellow-billed oxpeckers amongst the herd when one of the young buffalo started behaving very strangely. It just appeared to have collapsed, and was unable to get to its feet, so it was bleating and bellowing for its mother’s help. The mother and several females came to its aid, but no matter how hard it tried, it could not get to its feet. The cows moved off until the calf distressed called again. And this scenario repeated itself several times, and Andrew, Petros and I knew that it couldn’t go on for long.
I also got a kick out of the chocolate fondant headphones (I made mine out of raw cookies), which make the cupcake look a little like Princess Leia. I'll have to remember that, if I ever make Raw Star Wars Cupcakes again.
“19.”
The Cathedral, known as Southwell Minister, also marked the bicentenary of the Bramley Apple by commissioning a new stained glass window in 2009 – and very nice it is too!
In the last pre-season test at Barcelona, Red Bull introduced their updated front wing. Like the rest of the car, this is an evolution of what has gone before. Albeit based on the complex late-2010 set up, with 3-4 elements in differing areas across the wings span. It’s the endplate and cascade that have changed the most. While the flaps take some inspiration from Renaults early 2010 shape.
The fir tree was planted in a large tub filled with sand, but no one could see that it was a tub, because it was wrapped in a gay green cloth and set on a many-colored carpet. How the tree quivered! What would come next? The servants and even the young ladies helped it on with its fine decorations. From its branches they hung little nets cut out of colored paper, and each net was filled with candies. Gilded apples and walnuts hung in clusters as if they grew there, and a hundred little white, blue, and even red, candles were fastened to its twigs. Among its green branches swayed dolls that it took to be real living people, for the tree had never seen their like before. And up at its very top was set a large gold tinsel star. It was splendid, I tell you, splendid beyond all words!
08/10/2010 BUY 0.01 xauusd 1203.05 08/11/2010 1206.09 +3.04
8. Intermediate Documentary Filmmaking: This episode had a lot of different small plots going on that made it work. Donald Glover isn’t on screen for too long, and most of his dialogue is just screaming, and yet he manages to give the funniest performance of the whole season in this episode with the Levar Burton plot. This was also a great episode for Britta, as we get some insight into how her mind works (with some more help from Levar Burton), as well as a great improv session with her and Jeff as each other’s dads. I was pretty neutral towards the plot of Jeff and his father, but Joel McHale gives a great performance.
V/A - Sasquatch (Kirbdog Records. Comp with victims family, schlong, moral crux, cringer, nuisance, nomeansno)
+ Steam Powered Giraffe
“You are coming with us?” asked Bantum with a big broad grin when he saw Hermel coming up from the rear.
If this did not make you laugh, then you're probably one of those people I mentioned in the beginning. If that's the case, seek mental help. Now.
Andy’s exit left Olivia alone with Pam. Pam smiled up at her with a sinister looking grin and then walked around to the front of the desk. She sat down on the edge of the desk and stared at Olivia with that grin on her face.
At least I did.
I have TONS of all sorts of recipes pinned on Pinterest - and these Salted Caramel Chocolate Shortbread Bars stood out. Melt in your mouth shortbread, topped with a thick layer of rich, buttery, and perfectly chewy caramel, finished with a chocolate glaze and salt? Delicious! These bars got rave reviews; I'll certainly be making them again soon. Enjoy!
After the Rangers scored three runs in the top of the seventh inning, taking all the momentum that the Cardinals had gained a half-inning earlier, it looked like Texas would cruise to its first World Series title. The Cardinals had been a comeback machine all season, but they finally looked like they were running out of steam. The Texas clubhouse was ready for a party, and the great state of Texas was ready to forget that it's football season.
Obviously, not a picture of me!
I let out a snort.
I am a spiritual guide, business coach and lifestyle strategist.
I think this is part of it – I have spent a lifetime building up my YES team. Everyone needs a YES team. They’re the people who when you say, “Am I good enough?” – the answer is always YES. For them it is a no-brainer. They think your question is preposterous and that is exactly why they belong on your YES team.
This is an idea that I have been kicking around for quite some time now. I am proposing a series of writing contests, each centered around one of the Seven Deadly Sins. If you wish to participate, and complete the series, you would have an anthology of pieces that would reflect your ability and range. When someone asks to see a sample of your writing, you could toss your scarf over your shoulder and oh so casually say, “Well, I do happen to have an anthology based on the Seven Deadly Sins which showcases my talent”. Or some such.
Sharon Katz Cooper. 2010. 30p. Raintree (978-1410935014). Gr 3-5.
Back before 1970, foreigners held a 5 percent slice of U.S. public debt. Today foreigners hold nearly half the pie. And the government owes a bunch of it to itself — $4.6 trillion — including what it’s borrowed from the Social Security trust fund.
What I miss: Sleeping through the night w/o having to take 30 pee breaks.
to most morgues’ health code regs.
(okay, this is his photo, but mine looked just like it..I swear!)
But I’m a gardener!
I decided that I was going to use one of my French Provincial Bergere Chairs, upholstered in white. Sweet, sweet Gina from Slipcover Chic is going to take apart the current cushion cover and make one in white. Her work is so beautiful, and with so much attention to detail, I just know that I'm going to love it. She's also making pillows for me too!
And the simplest possible way to send a small donation is through the ‘text-to-donate’ system:
But I'll also share interesting things when I feel that urge to share rather than create (possibly due to laziness). One more change: I'll be blogging once a week- this is going to be my goal! No more, no less.
Last week's menu stayed on task and we enjoyed some pretty tasty meals, several were new to us and have found their way onto our list of favorites. This week I am attempting my first DIY project of the year, Homemade English Muffins. I am hoping they turn out as yummy as Utah Deal Diva's did!
Both clothing lines have been successful since they were launched and with success, controversy usually follows. From her use of real fur during her red carpet appearances to a Deréon Girls ad that enraged a lot of people due to the alleged “sexualisation” of young girls, even someone as popular and influential as Beyoncé could not escape the sharp eye of the critics. However, no matter what they throw at her, it does not seem possible to keep this girl down. The house of Deréon keeps turning out fresh collections that the fashion hungry public can’t help but buy. Once again, Sasha Fierce has proven that if you love what you do, anything is possible.
43.28% of our users have a screen resolution of 1280 (width) x 1024 (height), while 27.66% have a resolution of 1024 x 768.
You should be careful
Tie a pretty ribbon into a bow around the tin and elastic to hide it. Stick down your scallop paper with number and tie some pretty lace or ric rac around the bottom of each tin.
Her father sat on a long sofa of red velvet, a glass of merlot in his hand. His dark skin mingled with his pale purple eyes. His black hair, with a few streaks of gray, was fastened at his neck in a queue. He wore white pants, a white blouse, and a jeweled belt. She’d never seen any man so handsome.
3) violist
Aleppo has so far not experienced the violence and large-scale protests seen in other cities during the uprising.
Next I grabbed my nail gun and began to connect the peices. (There were actually staples loaded so I just used those, they worked the same). I used wood glue for reinforcement.
M.J. Rose (www.mjrose.com) is the international best selling author of eleven novels and two non-fiction books on marketing. Her next novel THE BOOK OF LOST FRAGRANCES (Atria/S&S) will be published in March 2012.
It's hard to believe, but the ranch has come to a close, and I'm home. I may be shipping off to Colorado on Saturday (I really hope not), but I'm here for all of today. Such a long time. The ranch though. Tuesday and most of Wednesday were fun-filled days of excitement where I laid in a bed with a raging fever. It lasted EXACTLY twenty-four hours, convincing me that diseases have some sort of evil consciousness. I can see them in their war room, cackling and planning. "What time period of sickness would be most annoying?" asks one. "A full twenty-four hours!" shouts another. "Here here!" The room erupts in a jubilee as my immune system acts up. It really sucked is what I'm getting at.
On Happiness…
First of all, there is the undoubted softness of water, that used in Dublin being a mixture of mere canal Dublin water, and river water, the organic impurity of which is counterbalanced, comparatively, by the antiseptic nature of wort constituents; then follows the selection of material, there being but little diversity of opinion as to what proportion of the different descriptions are most suited to the special flavour requisite, while as a general rule the Dublin brewers strictly adhere to exceptionally good pale and black malts, the proportion varying from 90 to 94 of so-called pale, according to its exact colour yield, and the balance of black. This is a very simple matter — a mere question of colour ; and all I want to point out is that brown, amber, or crystalline malts are not used in this centre.
6.) Musik … ;-(
The act of reflecting over my autobiography is as far as I can see an inevitable instance of relativity, that is, of events that are dependant on psychological, social, and environmental currents and their residue – both the historical event being pondered over and the actual activity of pondering.
"Baboons are an issue that must be dealt with here because they destroy travellers’ goods," the Zimbabwe Revenue Authority station manager at the Chirundu border post, Tichaona Phiri, told the newspaper.
For my project, I made a Mother's Day card and gift box!! I had a request to do a tutorial on a box I made for an earlier project and I am going to work on putting that together, so instead of including the instructions now for this box, I will have them soon. I threw all of my favorites into this project: Spellbinders, Cricut/Gypsy, Flower Shoppe, Distress Inks, embossing, sewing, lace, tulle, ribbon, gems and Kristal's amazing stamps!!
In the charity’s women’s shelter with a capacity of 120 beds, 70 of them will go to children as a result of the ongoing economic slump, he said. So the shelter also provides tutoring and oversight to make sure those children attend school regularly.
What happens if Devon falls for Ashley?
Merry Christmas everyone!! Have a fabulous holiday and I hope 2012 brings all you wish for!!
So we want to see you use something old, it can be any type of product or stamp etc. We also want to see something new that you have recently purchased. What a great way to use up your old products and combine them with the new!
I might be revealing too much, but he is my professor and is just too cute. Blond hair and dimples. Gotta love the dimples. He's in his early thirties so definitely not out of my range. Pretty sure he's not married, but I don't know about a girlfriend.
Thanks for another fabulous challenge last week. Your celebration themed projects were super, as always! Congrats again to our blog candy winner and Top 5 Stampers. And a big thanks to our sponsor Motivet for the wonderful prize and DT stamps!
Okay, so how does one build a Void Ray? Well, it’s at the same tech position as the Scout in the original StarCraft, and is available immediately upon completion of a Stargate. Its cost (200/150 in beta, now 250/150) is overall similar that of an old Scout (275/125). But it is significantly stronger, especially in air-to-ground.
On an August day in 1983, Bissinger, a former Philadelphia Inquirer reporter, author of A PRAYER FOR THE CITY and FRIDAY NIGHT LIGHTS, rushed to the hospital where his wife, who'd been on bed rest for two months, had just given birth to premature twins, born just three minutes apart.
Imaginarium designs
So why the prolonged absence I hear you cry?? Erm yeah good question I guess.
I have never been a fan of dumping players just because their form is slightly down. I would rather see the whole team go down for a year or two, and then be rebuilt as a whole unit, than the continual dumping of players. England has shown the value of sticking with players, whom are from time to time out of form. I would love to see Peter Fulton in at number 3 permanently, go with an opening pair and ride out some hit’s and misses to see if it settles down, and the rest of the order will sort it’s self out.
Hi ESSers!
If Mom’s a real culture buff, plan a museum-hopping spree. Stop at The Museum of Modern Art to view contemporary art, or visit the Metropolitan Museum of Art for photography, tapestries, and carefully preserved artifacts from all over the world. Mom will recognize notable 20th Century artworks at the Whitney Museum, and the dinosaurs at the Museum of Natural History.
Then she tells me she’ll be paying the rent and we need to get on the issues with the house because “it’s not in her lease.”
A big highlight each year is the participant readings on the final morning. This is where everyone shares the work they have been developing all week, and it’s a marathon – but it’s thrilling and galvanizing. The amount of talent on display just takes your breath away.
On the recommendation of some friends, I headed south to the island of Bohol, which is located in the Visayas, the belt of islands anchored by Cebu and sandwiched between Luzon — to the north — and Mindanao — to the south.
AUTISM DIAGNOSIS RATE RISES. The figure used to be 1 in 110. Now it's 1 in 88, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control. At that rate, about one million children and teens in the United States are affected by ASD. Wider screening and better diagnosis may be the reason. Find out more.
While we were enjoying a dinner that had probably cost the NBC in the region of eighty quid a head, for CAMRA members to show such visible and audible disgust at the beer choice of a brewer they and everyone else has huge respect for, to barrack and heckle in such a way, and to display such a sense of entitlement when they got what they had so rudely demanded, was not just grossly disrespectful; it was the behaviour of sugar-rushed ten year-olds at a birthday party.
VALF Literacy Technology Petting Zoo
What do you bake each and every year? Do you have treasured family recipes, or try new each year, or say to heck with it and buy from the bakery?
Preheat your oven to 400 degrees F/200 degrees Celsius.
corrupt too
Run, Doggy, Run. Laura Benn shares some great pointers on how to prepare yourself and your dog to run together. (iRun)
The World Bank (1999) describes it as:
ekbensah@ekbensah.net
Chargrilled Broccoli & Beans with Garlic, Chilli & Sweet Soy Rice Noodles
The logo also lent itself to a stunning use of repetition with her images and a beautiful custom pattern that was used inside the business cards and layered onto the image at the back of the brochure with a detail shot of the gorgeous hides she uses in her designs
Another problem is the casting. Bronson was 61 at the time. His age was showing. Holland was played as an a quiet, unassuming man who was prone to extreme acts of violence when provoked, then would go back to his normal demeanor. His dramatic shift supposed to be a shock, but it came across more as a guy who is sufferi mood swigs after a stroke.
Furthermore, one gets the sense that this is deeply rooted in a much longer story. The gospel is what has happened to bring the Creator’s interaction with the creation to its good and glorious climax. Specifically, this is the culmination of Yahweh’s involvement in and through Israel.
Creating fiction is a little like baking a cake. There are basic ingredients that can be combined in almost infinite ways with small artistic touches to create something unique and delicious. Of course, there are also hundreds of ways we can sabotage ourselves.
the touch
Paranoia set in before I handed over my documents, and in retrospect, I wonder if the uniformed border guard smelled my delusional fears as I sat in my hatchback waiting to cross into the United States of America.
¾ cup whipping cream
Don’t you hate it when you plan to cook a cow stomach on Sunday and then you go for dim sum on Saturday… and eat cow stomach?!?! LOL!!! No? Oh. Well, thats what happened and I felt like I should try something new on Sunday. So, Sunday morning I walked over to Hi Lo and bought a pig stomach, various interesting canned items and a stack of corn tortillas. The canned items included:
The first time someone said, “Ikaw, Jasmine, shy? Yeah right,” it completely blew my mind. I remember that little girl who couldn’t speak, who couldn’t get friends because they thought she was a snob, but in reality she was just too insecure to have any power to express herself. I remember that girl who felt helpless because her identity was something she didn’t want, and she didn’t know if she’d ever be free from her own self. If I could talk to that little girl, I would tell her to hope, to hold on, because time will come and she will be free.
“Is this my only option? If I don’t do this, will I become blind?”
Another Moon
Detangling is required in order to reduce knots and tangles that could lead to breakage. The method you choose is entirely up to you. Whenever you decide to detangle your hair, be very gentle to prevent strands from uprooting or breaking off.
there are days when you just have to go with the flow.
You can also get a glove that adds +6 on all stats, +1 Weapon/Magic ATT, +45 Weapon/Magic DEF, +100 Accuracy, and 5 slots. A little better.
"Well, Ok!"
Nevertheless, the question about contagion really hinges on the ECB at this point. The EFSF is too small to deal with either Spain or Italy effectively while they attempt to get back under the 3% hurdle and their bond spreads remain extra-wide. And the ECB is an unreliable provider of liquidity. The resignation of ECB chief economist Juergen Stark tells us that. When I say “the euro zone is coming apart at the seams now”, I mean that political cohesion is all but gone. The policy outlook is extremely volatile as major policy makers in the EU, in member states, and at the ECB have extremely discordant policy messages. Some like the Dutch Prime Minister are openly talking of how to break up the euro.
1-2- ‘Cirque de Imaginaire’ by Trinity Graduate Students
Sick. We slept like the sick: feverish, groaning and tensing up, our hair wet with sweat and stuck to our brows, mucus, dribble, crying through dreams, clenched fists and ugly faces. Sick. We were sick. Saying, “It hurts! It hurts so bad!” Drifting off into worlds of black, The Sins of our Fathers seeping out our skins. Sick. Ravaged by life. Sick. Sick to the bones. Turning grey. Fingers dark yellow. World shut out. TV on. Lines of bugs filing up the bin bags. Insane erections leaking watery cum. Tampons kicked to the bottom of the the bed with the socks. The flies gathering. Death getting near. Sick. We were so terribly sick.
The only thing I've noticed with them is that because they are a different, cheaper paper than the white ones, they soak up the OMS faster. Not a problem, just a note. On the up side, the small ones from them are smaller even than the collection of Tortillions I have and they work far better for blending in those tiny little spots that seem to crop up in just about any image.
After I watched the Italy-Paraguay game at work (where the Italians in the office supplied salami, provolone, bread, Nutella, San Pellegrino Lemonata, and gelato) I decided that I should get a haircut. So I waddled my way over to my favorite immigrant barber shop (if you call a wonderfully sketchy basement a barber shop) at Astor Place. I've gone there for 3 years now and absolutely love it. But Monday was by far the best experience I've had there:
I was pretty sure I had just been rewarded for what I did. Very rarely does TK Maxx stock Japanese brands never mind GYARU BRANDS! I had to have it. And here are the pics, just to back up what I'm saying since me Jane isn't exactly the most affordable brand and their outerwear ranges from about 8000Y-16,000Y (£62 - £125) and this isn't exactly a flimsy cardigan type - it's a proper Winter coat. Fur hood et al.
*Our beloved babysitter got a great job and is off for greener pastures.
05 Bring it on Down
So. All and all, not to painful as of yet. I am going to set goals and get things moving. And one of these days really soon when I am not illegally on the internet at work, I’m going to lay out the back story then set up the new plot of the way my life WILL be going from now on, and I will get what it is that I want out of this whole crazy, fatal, episode called LIFE-
Kicker The final paragraph of a story
But apparently, no. Toughness isn’t a desirable quality anymore. But being CUTE is.
“It is unbelievable that so much money is being thrown away on a system which doesn’t work and which we know can have a devastating impact on people’s mental health.”
This rout ensures Rangers will finish the season second in the Scottish Premier League. That in itself has never been a cause for celebration at Ibrox but in these troubled, administration-hit times, Rangers take every form of solace they can get.
I am grateful that we could spend Thanksgiving with some of our extended family in Portland. I fantasize sometimes about living close enough to share a meal weekly--or at least every other week. I don't know if it will ever happen, but it sure was lovely to be in the same room with those folks (and all the babies!) for a few hours.
... And here's a peek at just a few of the fab details:
This is when you feel gross, look gross, sound gross, smell gross, just everything about you is yucky. My skin is sallow. My hair looks sick. Every outfit I put together looks stupid. Even when I feel pretty, there is underlying yucky. I get out of the shower and I still feel yucky. I don’t want to be around people because I feel like my yucky may be contagious. I try to smile at people and be cheerful but I think they see my yucky and I have been getting the sympathetic head tilt from so many people I run into. My poor Son sees my yucky and tries to make me laugh and keep me from feeling any other emotion. He’s been really kind about it.
“Why, to rescue her, of course. What else would we do?” Grayson grinned slyly. “Think of the headlines. Distraught Fiancé on Trail of Kidnapper. I’ll be a national hero.” Grayson’s face went slack, and his eyes took on a vacuous gleam in a momentary lack of presence as he pictured himself an errant knight right out of Le Morte d’Arthur. Blinking, he came back to himself and focused on Doyle’s face. “Hell, man, you’re the publicity expert. Just get me in the newspapers. That’s what I’m paying you for. We’ll use this to my benefit. Public empathy will be immeasurable.”
It’s making its way to some important people this week, then we’ll see if Parliament wants it. Then the public. It’s scary what I dug up.
It's been a fun two days here. I also learned that my oldest son hasn't turned in numerous assignments at school. He's grounded until the second coming. Today my youngest son, who has been totally potty trained for over a year, decided to poop in the garbage can. Why? Why do they do things like this? For the love of all that is Holy, WHY??? I made him dump it out into a garbage bag. Then, apparently offended by the stench of his own poop, he figured he'd spray some air freshener around. Unfortunately he grabbed a can of lemon-fresh Pledge instead. He sprayed furniture polish into the air and it landed in a waxy coat on the laminate floors. They are now more slippery than the streets outside (which are really slippery because we just got another 5 feet of snow here.)
Schmoopyfest Oktoberfest - a few more weeks til bottling... no tasting 'til September!
G000
After the opening remarks by professor Douglas Arner, head of the Department of Law of HKU, who welcomed everybody and told that Law & Technology Centre of HKU has already existed for a decade.
That politician now returns. Obama’s new populism surely is a calculation that his halfhearted feints to the center after the midterm “shellacking” were not only unconvincing but would do him no good anyway with a stagnant economy, 9 percent unemployment and a staggering $4 trillion of new debt.
sat drinking their single-malts.
-- excerpt, D. J. Gaskin, poet
It seems to me that when Davis came on board, he was for a time quite agreeable to Rolly's approach, whether he would have admitted it or not (and from what I've heard about Marc, "not" is the better bet). Maybe this was because Walt was enthusiastic about Rolly's stuff and Davis wasn't stupid, but I suspect that Marc genuinely knew Rolly was on to something. Whatever the reason, it looks to me like Marc took some of Rolly's concepts as a given, a starting point for his own ideas. Consider these Davis sketches of the "Great Hall" (as it was called then), the forerunner of the changing portrait hall. The two sketches are intended to be taken together, as they represent the two ends of the same room:
On Wednesday, September 14th, 2011, I interviewed one of the most interesting and controversial figures on Earth.
The local Auto Parts store.
The second thing I discovered was that I don't particularly like the taste of candy melts! This was the first time I had used them and I think I was expecting it to taste like, well, candy! Instead it tastes like icing sugar and as if you are eating a giant lump of icing. I think it would be fine if it was covering something like a cake pop but I don't particularly recommend eating candy melts by themselves. However, I've noticed more recently that there are flavoured candy melts available - I think I saw peanut butter - which might be nicer than the standard flavour, which I think is vanilla.
(7-16 The Acid Test: A Sound City Production)
No need to fear though, I found plenty of time to read. A few plane flights and one day of laying on my own couch (post-Christmas trip) prepped me for lots of reviews to come.
For this mega project of mine (clearly I haven’t done enough for it) inspiration isn’t lacking. The Indian Prime Minister Mr P V Narasimharao’s mother tongue was Telugu and he had an excellent grasp on Marathi. In addition to eight other Indian languages, he spoke English, German, Persian, Arabic, French, Spanish, Greek and Latin. Thinking of him and the others of his stature thrills me no end!
Freezer burn,
Elli Fisher has never thought she was good enough. Let it be her job, her weight, her love life, nothing, she was convinced she couldn’t do anything right. She had walked through life for the past six years in a daze, never thinking that life could be good again after the abuse she endured from her ex boyfriend. She is lonely, sad, and depressed, that is until she meets Shea Adler. After doing a promotional shoot for the NHL team, the Nashville Assassins, she meets the hunky hockey player who shoots a puck, shattering her world.
I'm just a girl, lucky me
It came to a head at 9.45am on April 9. A discussion took place about the parking of a car and the right to do so. “The accused was there and took part in the discussion. She began to shout and swear that she would 'get this f*****g sorted out' and would get other members of her family to deal with it. She shouted and screamed in an aggressive manner. During the course of this she called one of the witnesses an English twat.”
The perfect Doctor Who episode, for me, begins in the TARDIS and ends in the TARDIS. Nothing annoyed me more than the trend during the 7th Doctor's run of not even showing the TARDIS during an episode.
The authority has also ensured its budget is on track after agreeing far-reaching efficiency savings across the organisation.
2. Get one pointed edge and fold it towards the center.
This uses all 38 possible skill points. Some parts of this build you should not feel obligated to get is luck and energy burn (9 skill points); They aren't completely needed to be maxed. Luck is more of a preference for me, and energy burn seemed most useful out of what was left. Some decent alternates can be painful rebound should you like to use reflect or some in ruination to get to purposefully curse (and extending rounds). I wouldn't put into shifty unless you want to sacrifice more from other parts of the build.
Have a great day!!!!!!
who loved you
Dae Su tracks down Woo Jin's penthouse apartment using a proverb that Woo Jin quoted. Woo Jin and his bodyguard escort him to the right floor when he can't figure out the access code. In the elevator, Dae Su says "You had sex with your sister." Once they reach his place, Woo Jin tells his guards to attack. Dae Su easily beats then all except for Woo Jin's main bodyguard, who doesn't fight, but tells him to be nice. Woo Jin explains to him that the rumor got around to everyone that Soo Ah was pregnant, causing her to develop a fake pregnancy. Dae Su accuses him of killing his sister to cover up the pregnancy. He notices Woo Jin has a picture of Soo Ah on the bridge she jumped from dated July 5th, although she supposedly died alone.
This past weekend I ate healthier than I usually do which helped with my weight loss. I did eat a Big Hunk candy bar (which is low fat for candy bars) when I got a sweet tooth and I ate Marble Slab non fat frozen yogurt vanilla and raspberries and non fat dark chocolate. These sweet snacks help out so much because I feel like I'm not depriving myself of something sweet yet they are either low fat or non fat.
In my classic Who DVD reviews, “Remembrance of the Daleks” aside, I’ve been pretty hard on the Sylvester McCoy era, and his three-year stint as a whole remains the least successful of the classic series, but that doesn’t mean I won’t call good, or even great, if and when I see it. The McCoy years were marked by lofty ambitions and weak follow-through, which I’ve discussed variations on several times over in these reviews, to the point where it’s become almost a chore to write up McCoy-era entries. How many different ways can it be said, “This just doesn’t work”?
I even made these little cards for myself with that “slogan” on them…to try to remind myself to just have courage and get started and that it would probably work out fine.
is to act as an information clearing house, and networking and coordinating medium for all those who choose to accept this proposal and invitation to action, and to make this action the best, the most principled, and the most effective it can be. It is a simple request to address a very complicated, brutal, and deadly situation.
I have written quite a few posts about what is going on but have not posted them for a couple of reasons. First, it made it feel too real and I am really leaning toward the ostrich approach to dealing with this whole mess—head. Buried. Deep. In. Sand. Second, there has just been so much unknown that I didn’t want to post stuff about the big bad potential and then it be out there and then this little spot be just that—a little spot. Third, I don’t want this blog to be a place where I just come to vent, whine, mope, moan. I want to bring solution, opportunity, options, or at very least articulate questions. I have had none of those things in the past month.
But it's more interesting than just that. Did you notice that the Stout contained two different types of brettanomyces, but the Pale Ale just one. That implies that one of the types almost certainly wasn't in the pitching yeast. Unless the Pale Ale and Stout were pitched with different yeasts.
As a perfect reward, the Antung Hot Springs area greeted us high on the other side of the mountains. We found a sweet place to stay, with an ensuite hotsprings-fed bath. The kindly owner even took the time to drive us into town (Yuli) down in the valley for dinner.
When I rinsed, I definitely felt cleaner, but my skin wasn't stripped. After a few days, my skin started to look rosier and had a healthier glow.
Camille's on Wheels
1 tbs vanilla extract
mommy so that she can give it to my sister when
You’re more than a friend
I really can not believe Christmas is in 2 days! 2010 flew by! It was a great year though without a doubt! It still doesn't feel real that Pablo and I are MARRIED!! woah! We have been together for almost 9 years... (March 24th will be 9 years!) I love him! :) There hasn't been too much going on around here just thinking about Macho, Erika and Gabriel! They are currently in Oklahoma for Gabriel's radiation at a facility called ProCure. They will be there until about January 25th! Gabriel is doing well, responding to radiation and chemo well. He is such a happy baby. Erika sends me pictures of him often and it just makes me smile because everyone he is smiling or laughing! I just love that chunky little man.
“When I played with your computer, I open google and typing keyword ‘freedom’.”
… You don’t have to match these, strictly speaking, but it will cause a lot of confusion for others who would use your public key. It’s best to exactly match the Full Name and the Email Address you specified in Mail. To keep things simple, we’ll generate a key pair for your e-mail address matching the Full Name and Email Address in Mail. If you don’t remember exactly what you set up, hop into Mail, go into Preferences and take a peek at your account configurations and note these pieces of information.
Remember, keep using a cable lock and a u-lock when you park at the New York Avenue Metro station. Don't leave a wheel unlocked where this boy, or anyone else for that matter, could walk away with it and take it home.
Shock can be good. If it is uncomfortable and gruesome it does not mean that it is morally 'wrong'. There can be an imperative to shock. Shocking practices are best shown straight i.e. shockingly. Extremes can bring hidden truths home by making them big and visible. Where are we headed? What, in these awful, horrifying,
Western astrology associates the 12 signs of the zodiac with 12 regions of the body. It’s a linear progression from Aries at the head down to Pisces at the feet with Libra at the centre of balance.
We play tug-of-war a lot; the dog trainer said it's a myth that that's a bad thing to do with a dog. Not true, she said. It's a good thing to do because it's fun. It also wears them out. Last night, after chasing Riley around the back yard, going on a walk around the block, playing tug-of-war, and then digging a hole (unauthorized) in the spot where I usually plant impatiens, she was exhausted.
Thankfully I never saw the video until today.
Do you know that no woman’s voice has ever made a deep impression on me, although I have met all kinds of famous women? But I firmly believe there is a voice for me somewhere on earth, and I am seeking it. Where on earth is it?[3]
Justin Blackmon: Anquan Boldin
I did not spend a dime in this necklace - I used some bits and bobs that I had around the house. Actually, it has been years since I used the fairy pendant for the last time. Hopefully it will get a lot more wear now...
Some Questions to consider
For now I keep them to myself……but still will love you…
Joan and imaginary friends can keep trying to FIGURE us out as to how and why we do anything…knock yourself out…and you can keep putting your own spin on things, such like you did in the book…wear yourself out. We on the other hand will continue on doing what we are doing
The crisis at Pattison's had repercussions for the whole whisky trade:
What fun I had putting these colors together. The colors: Pacific Point, Elegant Eggplant, Pumpkin Pie (orange), Teal and White are the July Colors of the Month for an SSSD swap. I put the colors together so many ways and this is what I ended up with. I love the orange & purple together and may have that as primary colors on my fall cards. I didn't like the Pacific Point and the purple together, but did like the two blues; and the white just didn't fit in anywhere. Being color challenged do you see my dilemma? I really like how this card came out and am quite satisfied with my color arrangement.
hats off guys
So I guess I've been mouthy lately. A bit mouthier than I should be.
Side-kick: Yeah, I think so…
Those who know me best will attest to this fact, and for those who do not, well....strap yourself in, the funhouse ride is about to start!
Cake lovers, rejoice! Now, amid the wide array of tortes, pies and ice creams that pop up this time of year, cake can finally stake its claim in springtime. Now, I'm sure there are plenty of other dainty, fruity cakes out there, but this was my first time making such a treat, so humor me, please.
Elizabeth Madox Roberts was already 40 years old when she fulfilled her life-long dream of graduating from college. While studying literature and philosophy Roberts was greatly inspired by the connections she forged at the college poetry club, and her first collection of poems (Under the Tree) was published the year after she left college. Since its publication in 1922, these children’s poems have never been out of print. Most of Roberts’ remaining years were spent in her hometown of Springfield, Kentucky, where she continued to produce highly-acclaimed poems, seven novels and a number of short stories. Roberts loved Kentucky, which she called her ‘Little Country’, and many of her works are based around the Kentucky mountain people.
I got no choice but to run; if I stay here Scooter Cobb is gonna blast my butt to kingdom come. And, telling the truth ain’t an option—whose gonna take the word of a kid over that of a policeman?
فطرت کے مقاصد کی کرتا ہے نگہبانی
With the help of his union, Reichert appealed that ruling, and was he was reinstated in March 2009. However, about a month later the Collinsville Police and Fire Board suspended him without pay after “federal prosecutors … raised new concerns against Reichert again questioning his
Leila Kogba, Director of Strategy and Partnerships in Islington, introduced the evening which was a part of Refugee Week.Herself a refugee from the Biafran War she said that she had never thought of herself as a refugee until she read about the war in Half a Yellow Sun by Chimamanda Adichie. "Writing is the most powerful way to tell a story," she said.
On that note, if you are on Facebook, make sure to check out the Kraftin' Kimmie Stamps page. It's a great place to hang out, chat, share photos and keep up to date on all the happenings at KKS. We'd love to have you join us there. :)
Boy has this post been a long time coming. I have missed my little blog over the past couple of months.
I use black and white with a pop of ONE color throughout the trip's various agendas.
I go to bed before they do now.
The Distinguished Service Cross is presented to Mike Curti, Private, U.S. Army, for extraordinary heroism in action near Gesnes, France, October 4, 1918. Private Curti, a litter bearer, went out alone in front of the lines several times under the severest of fire, and carried back wounded men from an exposed area, from which his company had been forced to withdraw.
Far, far he follow'd the meteor spark,
11:00 – Harvard Bass, These are Powers, JDH & Dave P @ Santos Party House $7 (21+)
*John Oliver and Wyatt Cenac (The Daily Show correspondents).
My lines aren't the straightest. (Although they're getting better.)
Holy Metal Batman! I have packages...and that's not good.
I’ll pirouette the devil's twirl of fury
-I have a tentative half marathon planned for April 2012. There are a few factors that may change that. However, if they fall through, I start training on December 26th and I can't wait!
THINK----BE WARNED
We have a leader of the day. Sun. is Treston, and Emma is Monday and Thursday, Jax is Tuesday and Friday, and Justus is Wed. and Saturday.
2048.E-X/22/1994. Reviewing a review of The Merchant of Venice. Chicago Tribune, sec. 1, p. 26. See Item D-III/12/1995, above. (Incorporated in Item C-1995(4), above, p. 64, n. 133.)
Comeback Love by Peter Golden
Here is Samantha and Princess.
I have images of Cody at Bug's age. Pushing a big wheel..a big wheel with a bucket on back where he would stash all his treasures. Treasure mostly being rocks and cheerios. No walker.
It took me a little bit of time to get things written out correctly. Time and a lot of advice from several different people who all had different ideas about the subject.
Relationship to Killer:- Wife
My pets are overlooked in my BlogWorld; the joy they bring just isn’t as humorous as the humans currently occupying the house. But I think they are due their 15 minutes of fame. I also thought this would be the perfect chance to speak up for one who cannot speak for herself….
Update on 4/26/2012: I’m way behind on the schedule for this, because it’s the first novel I’ve ever seriously tackled, and also this particular story is difficult for a number of reasons. However, that’s not a bad thing. It is, after all, centered around a hypothetical terrorist attack on the Statue of Liberty on the Fourth of July; it probably would be better to publish this after that holiday is over for 2012. I’m setting a new publishing goal of mid-July, somewhere between the 15th and the 21st.
Some people may think a blog about gardening is boring. But Dave, owner of one of the largest gardening websites around, would beg to differ. In August 2000, Dave created a blog dedicated to his love of gardening. His mission was to connect with new gardeners and experienced farmers around the world.
So I found a bunch of paper grocery bags. Well, actually, I had five on-hand, did a Facebook request for the other thirteen, and then made plans to pick up the offered bags from my neighborhood friends. But then Michael came down with a wicked lung infection and then we were hit with an enormous dump of snow and I just couldn't fathom braving the icy winds for some grocery bags. I just waited until grocery shopping night and asked them to bag up my groceries in paper. It seemed like it was taking a really long time for the bagging boy to bag up my groceries, so I told him that I really just needed thirteen paper sacks and if he just wanted to give those to me and bag up the rest of my groceries in plastic bags that it would be OK. After he seemedly breathed a sigh of relief, he counted out the number of paper bags that would get me to thirteen and proceeded to bag everything else in plastic and said that next I should just ask for the bags upfront. (With a smile, he was a nice boy.) I still find it all rather amusing.
And for the record, the American Homebrewers Association has said Trenton lawmakers have the right idea about scrapping the permit, but the wrong notion about striking homebrewing from the state's books. The AHA prefers language declaring homebrewing legal and exempt from taxation be put on the state's books, just forget the permit.
Bahrain (Pearl Square)
Sometimes a reader can know "too much," especially when it comes to reading alt-histories or alt-realities. This was certainly the case for me in reading The Dragon Waiting. Although Ford is not a poor prose writer, there really is not anything spectacular about his writing; he describes events in a workman-like fashion and the plot pieces just fall, one-two-three, finis. The slightly-altered historical personages and Ford's invented protagonists do not mesh well together and there is nothing convincing about the dialogue that takes place. Although the question of the "dragon" may be of interest to some readers, it failed to have much of an impact with me.
retreatants can receive true healing from the sacraments.
True or False?
Howdy Vintage Friends EVERYWHERE....!
Any aspiring media professional knows that their future success will depend on their ability to bond wholeheartedly with new media. Why? Because new media has made its way into every media role and has therefore, become inescapable!
Screen: 14 inch Wide Clear SuperView HD LED backlight, 1366 x 768 pixels
I’m very late getting this post up. Yesterday, I had internet difficulties and couldn’t get online until this morning. Yay.
Installation of partially failed.
Kingfisher Airlines – Section of co.’s pilots threatened not to report for duty from 9 May, if management failed to pay their January salaries. (Economic Times/PTI)
I need a break before I go insane. One thing at a time. Just what's in front of me. Today I totally fucked something up. something major. And for the first time in a long time, I was at a total loss. I had no idea how to fix the situation. Pretty scary.
As the last English soldier was shot, the Boer general raised the flag and shouted in Afrikaans: “South Africa for the white man, and the British can come too, because we are all in this together.” The British tourists, of course, did not understand a word.
in the meadow sky, the snow still arriving
P.S. I don't ALWAYS select "White". If there's a place for me to write-in, then I will write-in "Hot". Here's my last U.S. Census form...
This is one of those few movies that my Dad let us watch when we were growing up. I can almost recite this movie word for word. I love it. I think it is hilarious in a way that no other actors could achieve. It takes me back to a place of being a child and thinking that farting and setting a fire was the funniest thing on Earth. If you haven’t seen this movie, then you are probably living under a rock. Or you are 15. In either case you need to see this film before they do the next one. I think it might be really cool to see those guys re-visit this after so many years. I am really looking forward to it.
~ Bummis
Cover outside of container with felt, fabric, paper or paint. Use exacto knife to make X over punched hole.
The film has Death Wish vigilante elements, but it has depth and detail that most variations on this subject lack. The violence is hard and brutal, the sound design is imaginative, and all the performances (including a turn from the always-stellar James Russo) are top notch.
But today they're just ignorant little girls who don't think past what they're going to wear tomorrow. Obviously they weren't thinking when they posted this. "Don't post this on facebook because all our friends are black." Not for long, bitches, not for long.
- Pets
I did this entire process... times 8 chairs and making a video....
While the birthday boy did his homework, my other brother and I were watching television, arguing about who got to choose what to watch. It was probably something like Facts of Life versus Cheers.
They do have some technology that can control humanity, but as humans they do not have the powerful telepathic mind control that reptilians do. Dark agenda groups know that their lives are being cut short by the lack of assistance from the powerful reptilians. They are scrambling for some sense of control. And, they are scattered on the Earth in smaller groups. They still think that they can maintain the secrecy of their coded groups.
This is the centuries old question for both easterners and westerners. Every one want to know who and what in their family are doing or will do in future. Father wants to know what his son or daughter is going to become or rather want to become when they grow up. Police want to know what the criminals want to do ? State want to know what its enemies are planning ? Political parties wanted to know what their friends and enemies are planning to do ? Scientists wanted to know- if possible for example at least couple of hours- before whether earth quake is coming or not to save many lives. Americans or Russians want to know at least 12 minutes before any nuclear attack so that they want to send important VIPS in to bomb shelters. Same way spy agencies will be glad if the know that their fresh recruitment is honest or corrupt or will sell country secrets to another country. Again spy agencies want to know if they can know the weakness of other countries spies, will he sell secrets for sex, money, liquor, for his children student visas, or just for a feeling of self esteem. This helps the agencies to either not recruit him or place him in insignificant positions.
kissed by your eyes
Earlier today I got a message from my friend and fellow English teacher Scarlett asking if I wanted to go down to the city center for the festival going on this weekend. It turns out it was the Mangalica Fesztivál. The mangalica (spelled “mangalitsa” in English) is a special Hungarian pig, covered in curly hair, hence its other name, the curly-haired hog. They had a few stalls set up where festival-goers could take a peek at some live pigs, if they wanted to. There were blonde pigs, brunette pigs (known as swallow-belled, because they’re black on top with white bellies), and red-haired pigs, plus a fourth stall with a mother and some month-old piglets! The blonde mangalitsa almost looks like a sheep at first glance, with its light-colored fleece-like hair.
"My friend" died almost six months after being shot due to complications from his injury
The thin-cardboard containers are instantly reminiscent of milk cartons. Or Chinese food containers. The latter is a good reference, since you don't buy Chinese takeout to stick in the refrigerator for an extended stay. You eat it upon arrival. And with the Crafty Carton, you drink the beer, Jack says. (The containers struck us an option to glass pitchers in busy bars; nothing to run through the dishwasher, just chuck 'em into waste-paper recycling. It's not unlike setting a carafe of coffee on a table.)
“The whole thing is barmy. These people are determined to achieve their final objective.
Pours a slightly hazy amber with a quickly dissipating tan head. Throws off a nice smell though, slightly peppery with some alcohol. So far, better than expected and seemingly on type.
In all the raids conducted by the Prophet Muhammad, he was the one attacked. If she knew anything about the Koran and the Sunna… She should read the Torah and tell us what it says. With regard to distant cities, the Torah says: “Slay all their males by the sword.” It does not exclude elderly men or children. As for the nearby cities of Palestine, which they call the Promised Land, the Torah says: “When you enter them, annihilate everyone, and do not leave a breathing soul.” The concept of annihilation originated in the Torah. What does that woman have to say about this? This is the Torah in which Bush and the Christian Right believe.
Twenty-four innings were played on May 8, 1984 until the game was suspended on account of curfew. The game resumed the next day, when Harold Baines hit a game-winning home run and three time Cy Young Award winner Tom Seaver won the game in relief. Seaver was the starting pitcher for the regular game scheduled after completion of the suspended game and Tom picked up two wins that day.
“You are surprisingly proportionate,” I said.
One hand in the air for the big city,
1 cup (250 ml) buttermilk
5. Spend time with your family.
Enter the wonderful folks at www.backyardchickens.com, who not only have simple, step-by-step instructions for how to make this, but also tell you how to get the materials for about $50 total.
We are to be like Christ.
Love it or loathe it, the Union lasted exactly fifty one years- and 100 years ago today, the South Africa as we know it was born.
So now we have to work that concept into an attention-getting pitch paragraph. Since we are playing with making our pitches sound like good cover flap copy, here’s what the flap reads for this book:
Nearly all the focus seems to be on new drug treatments for women who already have breast cancer. As much as that is important to me in particular, it isn’t at the top of my priority list. I want to know how to keep my daughter…and my son for that matter, from getting this. With what I’ve learned so far I’m making a decent start…nutritionally, environmentally, etc. I intend to share that info here in other installments. But in the meantime I hope I’ve got some of you started on thinking outside the box during this month of pink ads for breast cancer awareness…hope I’ve got you thinking about awareness from another perspective. I really hope that maybe if a few more people shift focus to prevention we can stop this disease in its tracks and diminish the need for medical technology after the fact.
Athens had never been home to me, and Atlanta, although a great city in many ways, didn’t feel all that homey to me either. That I was born and raised there was immaterial. It wasn’t “home.”
Get real if you ever think you are ever going to become PM.
I quickly explained that I couldn’t really see her, but recognized her voice. Then I cracked a couple of blind jokes to let her know it’s cool that life sometimes throws you curveballs and that there are upsides to everything – even crappy things like going blind. I am learning so much about the world, about industrial design, about human nature, and that the rule The Only Real Limits Are The Ones You Put On Yourself still applies.
For starters I noticed this years Free Friday show at auditorium shores is a humdinger for my demographic of aging hipster dufuses who love their 70's, 80's, and 90's power-pop rock. Do you have troubles staying out past 9PM? Are you too old for the grind of 4 nights up til 2AM? Are you beset with children and don't feel like getting a babysitter? Do you still think "Live at Budokan" is the live album that others should use as a template for creating a live album? If you answered yes, then you'll love this lineup.
I found it odd that the one creative act that no man could ever do, was put down and written about in disgusting terms by feminist writers such as Simone de Beauvoir and Shulamith Firestone (who gained far more attention from other feminists than those writers such as Barbara Katz Rothman and Gena Corea, who wrote cogently and intelligently about birth issues). I think this led de Beauvoir and Firestone, among others, into philosophical nonsense that led to a great deal of confusion and poor policy. This is probably one big reason that we have ‘one-size-fits-all’ birth care policy and virtually no regulation of assisted reproductive technologies in the US (no laws, no rules against the implantation of multiple embryos even though these involve great risks to the health of the mother).
* Stir for few minutes, add salt if needed, remove from heat. Do not overcook, it will become rubbery. Add lemon juice and stir.
I picked up some butternut squash, red peppers, parsnips, leeks and chicken broth. That is what looked good so that is what I bought. I think there are many combinations of squash/pumpkin and root vegetables that would work well but roasting them is key to the delicious flavor of this soup. One of the reasons that I chose this recipe is that the veggies need to roast for 45 minutes to an hour. We need the heat, so the longer roasting time the better. Never thought I would cook just to stay warm but here I am.
With Christmas eve now less than a week away, I thought I would share with you a strange experience I had last year around this time (with apologies to Clement Moore).
My goal would be to develop a strong, loyal relationship with clients, so we can help each other and negotiate fair rates year round. As a broker, it would be my personal responsibility to bring in as much money as possible. Please reconsider me for the (…position) because I am driven, personable, and professional. I greatly look forward to hearing from you regarding this position.
Another interesting theory tossed out: Having felons serve their sentences day for day could be reducing the number of parole violators in county jails, since if they're not being supervised they can't be arrested for violations: “'Instead of releasing (prisoners) conditionally on parole, some states are using expiration of sentence, which is (when prisoners) serve their full sentence and then they’re released,' Harrison said. 'Early indicators suggest that if you’re not watching recently released inmates, they’re not going to come back into your purview. The more you watch them, the more you will find in terms of parole violations.'”
The formula was fairly nice on the consistency scale. The glitter didn't give it a chunky feeling at all and I didn't have to play around with the brush to get the glitter to evenly distribute. Both pictures reflect two coats on top of Nail Tek Foundation II, then I layered two coats of top coat to give it a smooth finish.
I am honoured that I am trusted to work with horses that are worth so much money. But to me it's not what they are worth, they have the same value to me as any other animal. Some laugh at me because I constantly talk to them. I tell them what we're about to do, where we're about to go, how much fun it'll be.
I have to plan what we will do if SHTF happens. Do we have skills and goods to barter? Should I dust off my dog bonding talents or horse skills that may possibly put bread and milk on our table in an hour of need? And where? One of my books-in-progress is about my visits to various American cities in search of the one where we could settle and feel at home again. I have not found this city.
1. His goggles. I want them. They are wonderfulness packed inside welding goggles.
To make our administration much easier, please, if possible, register on-line with a credit card at our website: www.aandeconference.org/register
The American People are waiting for you to become a president – whether or not you are qualified – whether or not you are eligible.
The ones that make my eyes burn with newly forming tears.
I recently noticed something about myself.
In the meantime Dad gets his act together so Helen tries to dissuade Will from coming. But it’s too late. Will, it has to be said, is not unlike the rakish Damon Salvatore in The Vampire Diaries and the reason for their animosity is much the same too: a woman. In the case of Peter and Will the woman is Helen who both brothers fell for but Peter married. Helen was not a vampire when they met. She was what they call an ‘unblood’ but agreed to be ‘converted’ on their honeymoon. And that’s what Peter believes happened but it looks like she faked it. As is the case in True Blood the bond between a vampire and his or her maker is a strong one. Another reason Helen would want to keep a good distance between her and Will. She never imagined at the time she would have such conflicted feelings.
You see… I was looking at the "Learn Something New Every Day" class over at Shimelle.com. Several of my online buds had been talking about it… most of them were signing up for it. I wanted to, but as with any class, I wasn’t sure I’d be able to “keep up” with it. I do work two jobs and have been embarking on a personal journey, as well as keeping up a house with a furry zoo recently filled with health problems. I hate to overcommit myself, but at the same time, I really need and love to have the prompts and the push to do something creative… for myself… on an every day basis. I also love to learn new things and so this class seemed to be up my alley. The last class I officially “took” was Shimelle’s Blogging for Scrapbookers, and well… here I am still blogging away. Wouldn’t it be great if this class would prompt me to continue to learn something new every day even after the class was over?
This time he didn't have to go too far back - intrigued by some good (albeit mixed) critical reviews, he ordered The Fall, out in 2006.
Timothy: No, I…I think about it. I ask how the words and sentences fit together. I look for what it means.
out altogether
Bianca looked at me with those gentle eyes and then wrapped her arms around my neck.
I just wish we could have gotten to know these characters a lot more than the author let us: What did Keleigh like to do in her free time? How did Locke feel about losing his girlfriend? I never really learned these things, and if they were mentioned, it was much too late in the book for me to care about.
I've been blogging about food for over a year now, and I'm enjoying it. Will this turn out to be just another one of my temporary infatuations? Will it bring me lasting contentment? Who knows. But I've always loved food, and I've always loved writing. I'm happy to see where this takes me.
Starlight Distribution’s sales manager and head bottle washer, Tim Eads, will be on hand to pour free samples of a few lesser-known beers from the Shelton Brothers portfolio, including examples of Jolly Pumpkin (they’re back), Pretty Things and St. Somewhere. He may also have a few drams from Louisville’s Against the Grain brewery.
Or can you imagine a gay person saying "Oh, sure, Dwight's a good friend of mine. He compares my relationship with the love of my life to goat-bangin' but other than that, he's a good guy." It's bullshit. Even a log-cabin Republican would have more dignity than to befriend someone like that. (maybe GOProud. . .)
Newspaper, ripped up in quite large strips.
Xoya holds her decapitated head in her hands. I am unsure of how we are able to speak without breathing. I am even more uncertain of how Xoya speaks. When she talks, it is like listening to a whistling wind on an overcast night.
Present tense: Lie
Galen is the prince of the Syrena, sent to land to find a girl he’s heard can communicate with fish. Emma is on vacation at the beach. When she runs into Galen—literally, ouch!—both teens sense a connection. But it will take several encounters, including a deadly one with a shark, for Galen to be convinced of Emma’s gifts. Now, if he can only convince Emma that she holds the
God, please help me
Read Mr. Armendariz’s direct quotes;
The other day – 6th January – was The Epiphany and on that day, quite by co-incidence, I had an Epiphany. I made the realisation that when I deduct the cost of childcare from my take-home pay I’m left with €900 per month or €225/week. Apparently – according to my twitter-friends who know more about these things – if I stopped working I would get a PRSI payment of €200/week for the first 12 months. I don’t know if that figure is then taxed – researching un-employment benefit has never previously been on my agenda; but if it’s not it means that the difference between me sitting at my desk and sitting at home is €5/day.
When it became light outside I looked out the bedroom window to see about a dozen people roaming around, definitely zombie like, some of my first thoughts were, that I would have to somehow tell my boss why I will not be coming into work, then I realized how absurd that was, if my phone has no service and demonized people are lurking about, I am sure he is not too worried about me showing up.
I had to go under a surgery of Appendectomy last week and I will need 2 weeks to recover and hope get back in shape.
Doing some breastfeeding (shockingly) my milk came in about 4 days after I gave birth and were super engorged. Then I got sick with either a blocked duct or even mastistis in my right boob and I fell into a coma for a day. Plus I think I was just exhausted.
Even though I have worked with toddlers for many years and have seen their sense of wonder and curiosity lead to new discoveries every day, having the little one living with me has made me even more aware of this. He hadn't had many experiences outside of his room, home or neighborhood. I am used to slowing down for the typical toddler as everything seems new and interesting to them. But, with this little one I find myself having to work a little harder at following his pace. He is so enthralled with everything he sees that it is hard not to enjoy that sense of wonder. At home, he spent most of his free time just walking around the house, back and forth between the kitchen and living room, just because he finally had space to do so.
We stopped at the park near Chinaman’s hat island. I wish we had better weather!
I will miss them Stacey
Welcome, everyone! Today I'm bringing you Fezariu's Epiphany by author David Brown. I've hosted a lot of books here, and I don't ever pick one that I'm not personally interested in reading. But I have to say, there's something about this book that stands out to me more than many others. I can't put my finger on what exactly it is, but from the moment I read the information I was all over this book. I even ordered it that week....
I had some shell buttons in my stash which I thought went really well with this card and also added some string which I have sewn at the side of the sentiment to keep up with the theme.
Nevertheless, the issue, as always, is that British judges should have first bite of the cherry. There must, of course, be provision for extradition, but only after a British judge has decided there is a case to answer, and that a foreign trial is both necessary and without a reasonable alternative.
I wasn’t a winner in the whole thing, just because I had a buffer of Leo between me and OCD guy, though. Nuh-uh. I got to sit behind a dude that was larger than average (which I do not judge him for, at all!) who apparently didn’t think that showering sometime within 3 days prior to flying, or washing his clothes within the previous month would be a good idea. He smelled lovely.
The remission of sentence was in effect giving a birthday present to sentenced criminals, NP spokesperson on correctional services, Gert Oosthuizen, said.
My commentary tells me they weren’t just sniffling quietly into their tissues in the good old Western style. They were “wailing” (klaiontas).
time in the bottom 6th when he drew another walk, he would come around to
References: Warning, if you have arachnophobia, please don’t click on the last link or, at least, don’t say I didn’t warn you?
The traffic lights are out and police are directing traffic at a major intersection. Surely there's something I can make from that. Hmmm . . . Unexpected glitches in life and the people who show up to help?
with God.
- American IPA with roasted acorn squash & apricot-walnut compote
'Coping with Chloe' is about a twelve year old girl called Anna who has an unusual relationship with her twin sister, Chloe. So unusual, in fact, that she believes Chloe now lives inside her (Anna's) head and shares her body. Why? Well, the reason will emerge as you read the book. At the beginning, Anna is happy with the arrangement, in spite of the reaction of her family and friends. Then a good-looking new boy called Joe arrives in Anna's class and seems to want to be friends with both Anna and Chloe. Anna is pleased at first, because Joe is just about the only person who is aware of Chloe's presence. But when he can't make up his mind which twin he likes best, trouble starts to brew. It's not helped by Lisa, the class bully, who has designs on Joe of her own. And when Chloe turns on Anna and starts to threaten her, things get very nasty indeed.
I wonder what its life could have been; would it have been a girl? Would it have looked like its father? Would it have grown up to change the world? No, I made this decision for myself; it wouldn’t make it to the end of the day. Its short life has been lived. I pull my hands away from my belly quickly; this is not the time to think of it as a person. I forced my eyes closed again, a frown settling on my face, this is my child. I did this; can I live with my decision in the end?
Curve:
Robert Reich sums up this situation well:
1 falling
* As is the mother, so is her daughter. Ezekiel 16:4
“Thank you,” said Athelstan Digby, “and you too, I hope, will not forget to look me up in Bradborough. Good evening!”
Gulf of Paria is a war zone.
I wish I had a picture of Cullen's face when I told him that his sister was on her way. I wish I could forever capture Kadin's bright smile at the news. And how we can finally, let Liam know, she will have a birthday. And we will know when it is.
btw, i finished the hat! Now all I have to do is decide how to attach cat ears that won’t be permanently on there…because I want to be able to take them off.
A little digging showed my inner voice to be true. I had picked up a satirical news thread. It could have been Andy Borowitz or The Onion but I'm familiar with those. I removed it within 5 minutes of publishing. But the damage is done. It's out there...somewhere, like Sally's pending 40th birthday in "When Harry Met Sally".
Of course, finding heavy-handed stuff annoying or whether the end justify the means or is something very personal and it differs from person to person. It’s not a good argument or anything so I am not saying that KGNE is objectively better than Madoka.
Good Morning Ladies!
Do you think they emphasized the family enough?
In the "sideways" did Jack imagine he had a son? Locke tells him he doesn't have a son, yet Locke remarked about his son looking just like him in last week's episode. Also in the "sideways" Locke can get up and walk pretty much immediately after major spinal surgery.
It's so weird for me, though. It's outside of the realm of normal for me, outside of my comfort zone. Not the milk, but the amount. I guess I'm just used to having my jug of formula, and having a very visual idea of how much she's taken in for the day. It's harder for me to tell with bags of varying amounts of breast milk in them.
and bake as directed.
Leadership is the art of getting someone else to do something you want done because he wants to do it. – Dwight D. Eisenhower
you know who you are
“In times of extreme volatility, people flee to the sidelines,” Thomes said. “They go to cash and they go to money market accounts. They might go to their mattress, which is not the best decision, but people are doing it in huge numbers, just like you saw in ’08 and ’09.”
1pm – Lunch & wine
Many American doctors are “unapologetic” mandatory vaccination advocates because that is what they are told to be by public health officials and leaders in major medical organizations, such as the American Academy of Pediatrics17 and the American Medical Association.18 In fact, about 40 percent of pediatricians in America today proudly say they flatly deny medical care to families, who refuse to follow their orders to “get vaccinated.”19
They come and see nations
And the Legislator (Allah) put the one who brings about a thing to happen equal in rank to its doer, both in reward (for the good deed) and in punishment (for a crime). So the inviter to a good deed and the inviter to an evil deed both will have a reward (good or bad) equal to the reward of the one who has done that deed.
09:45 - Michael Marlow The economic inpact of smoking bans in hospitality venues
Warm up: 5 min on Chair bike
Robin Murphy: Thank you Carol, it’s been a pleasure. I guess I would have to say to any new author out there trying to get their story published not to give up, and try author assisted publishing. It’s a wonderful experience and every bit as professional as the big publishing houses, and so much easier than trying to self-publish. Everything P&S Books Publishing stated they were going to do was done. I’m happy with my final product for Sullivan’s Secret and I just know it’s going to capture a lot of readers out there.
In 1871, Austin finally got a City Hall of its own that didn’t have to be shared with other businesses or organizations. It was built, naturally, at Eighth and Colorado, and was a fairly nondescript structure, except for a bell tower on its southeast corner. Within just a few years, a great many bats, apparently impatient for the construction of the Congress Avenue bridge, took up residence in the building.
All the Folding Chairs You Want. Find Folding Chair Bargains Here!
But, he said, this did not include other problems such as dozens and even thousands of voters registered at the same address and 42,000 voters whose ICs could not be found in the National Registration Department’s (NRD) database.
The emotions were also intensified because I’m a part-owner of a business in Tuscaloosa. So as the tornado moved across my television screen, I was pretty sure that the business was being destroyed.
I was compassionate in appearance and in action, but in my mind I was
I mean the real deal $100 plus running shoes. I recommend you visit a true running store where someone can analize your gate and foot. A great pair of running shoes are expensive for a reason. Don't think you can save your self $50 or $60 and you won't notice the difference. You will. And you have to get running shoes, not crosstrainers, not aerobic and not tennis shoes. Personally I like the Ascis Gel Nimbus.
READERS What works for you? Share your tried-and-true technique or tip in a comment or via recipes@kitchen-parade.com. I'll add it to my list and share it along the way. Yes, I'll mention your name! (First names only, of course, locations if you provide the information.)
Jews May Lie to Non-Jews, Baba Kamma 113a. Jews may use lies ("subterfuges") to circumvent a Gentile.
This typically knocks the wind from their sails, but gators are dangerous critters with small brains. It’s prudent to wrap their snouts - very carefully - with electrical or duct tape. Then, sever the spine behind the skull. Their eyes should shut after giving up the ghost.
FQEVI Blog (fqeviblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
$4.00 off any Gas-X Prevention product
The film stars Henry Hopper, Mia Wasikowska, Ryo Kase, Schuyler Fisk, Lusia Strus and Jane Adams – with Gus Van Sant onboard as director – what was it like working with the cast and crew on-set?
(Fiona says: I'm still waiting for Lucy's answers and so we've cheated and skipped a person to get to Penny - I'll post Lucy's answers when they come through!)
This is not the first time the monsters have been rumoured to return. Back in 2010, a piece of Yeti artwork from concept artist Peter Mckinstry spread the net with many believing it to be for the Christmas special. But it turned out this was actually for the Doctor Who DVD Files magazine.
There can never be peace on Earth, without the Price of Peace, Jesus the Messiah present. Behold. He will soon be back. Till than. Learn from the wisdom of Jewish King David:
This Friday gone, for the first time, I dealt with one of those situations. It wasn't too big and I wont go into the full details of it, but a glass pint jug was thrown, a window was damaged and there was a scuffle outside. I was told I dealt with it really well but to be brutally honest, I knew the person causing the problem well and had it been a complete stranger, I don't think I would of been so fast and confidant with dealing with it. I'm a pretty small guy and I'm also fully aware that I'm a weak, un-intimidating person to boot, so in hairy situation I'm not really the best guy in the world to handle someone being violent, and in a fight, I'm just as likely to back away and give in as the french. (sorry, bad joke...but you didn't really expect me to be 100% serious did you??)
The second problem that I encountered is that the v-neck sags outwards a LOT. I've tried to conceal some stitching inside the garment, but am contemplating placing a button here...
To file a Hague Abduction Convention application for the return of or access to a child, a parent or legal guardian can review the eligibility criteria and instructions located on the State Department website, and then complete, sign and date the application form.
Wilcox adds that insurance companies should benefit from a particular increase in birth rates among the more educated and affluent demographic group.
Limiting this list to just 10 inevitably meant plumping for some personal favourites and some unavoidable but great, even classic, books that somehow you just can’t do without. So, for today, these are my top mystery books set in and about San Francisco, still beautiful and mysterious - just like my old friend.
Cassia has always trusted the Society to make the right choices for her: what to read, what to watch, what to believe. So when Xander's face appears on-screen at her Matching ceremony, Cassia knows with complete certainty that he is her ideal mate . . . until she sees Ky Markham's face flash for an instant before the screen fades to black. The Society tells her it's a glitch, a rare malfunction, and that she should focus on the happy life she's destined to lead with Xander. But Cassia can't stop thinking about Ky, and as they slowly fall in love, Cassia begins to doubt the Society's infallibility and is faced with an impossible choice: between Xander and Ky, between the only life she's known and a path that no one else has dared to follow. - Goodreads
Their are many things that go into making a good song. The Lyrics, the notes, the artists preforming. The most important quality that makes a good song is the memory it gives to someone. Trisha Yearwood said it best with "The song remembers when".
6. I see my mother on TV – True – Mom is an actress and she shows up on my TV from time to time. She hasn’t been acting too much lately, as she and Dad are bogged down with blog reading assignments. As you may have read in an early post of mine, she and my father have a history of squandering her residual checks on cruises and dog-sweaters.
The New York Times Lens blog has a cool post today about a website called Historypin and the Brooklyn Museum's recent embrace of the site as a tool in identifying the location of old photos. The site uses crowd sourcing to help identify the exact location of where a picture was taken.
We spent three hours filming, taking short periods sporadically to eat a slice or two of pizza. From the Fugitive Slave Law to “Fifty-four forty or fight,” we were able to complete a few events from history, complimented by the random appearances of Lincoln.
Finish – Long and flavor-filled, lead by sweet fruit that gently yields to tart and subtle flavors of flowers, soft spice and a hint of slate. A soft dryness then encroaches, spreading all around the palate, eventually puckering the lips and drying the cheeks.
Stormfather! Shallan thought. This has to be the king himself! Not Jasnah’s brother, Elhokar, but the king of Kharbranth. Taravangian.
Hello and a very merry Snowpocalypse to all! Here in my part of the country we're not only blanketed in snow but also freezing fog at the moment, which means that the view from all my windows now has one feature and one only: white. It's a bit eerie, like waking up in another dimension. I'm simultaneously looking forward to and dreading walking the pooch later on. Let's hope I don't fall down a hole or anything.
Test the graphic on a piece of scrap paper by drawing the shape of the envelope on the paper to see if you have it square and the right size. The graphic needs to be about 1 1/2" away from the sides of the envelope. If you use a graphic that is rectangle, you can use the straight lines for folding lines. If this is the case, the graphic needs to be 1 inch away from the sides.
WG: How many people does your company employ?
“Under SOPA, these intermediaries could be ordered to censor or block access to, and funding for, any site accused of copyright infringement, without due process, without a jury or the right to rebut accusations,” Doctorow goes on. Who does the ordering? The US State Department, Doctorow tells us. Carr says it’s the Department of Justice.
The pictures I have chosen are of people together. I like these two as they reflect family time and the special moments that people create by being ‘out and about’ while making the most of just being together. There are also yachts and seagulls ‘together’!
It was AC Limoux but for that you have to handpick and all the wine must be fermented in barrel. This instead is only partially oaked - 25 – 30% - in 600 litre wood, and is machine harvested at night. James finds that 600 litre barrels respect the fruit, so that the wine is not overoaked. Quite ripe and rounded, buttery, quite textured. James said that he was looking for the freshness you would want for an aperitif, but with sufficient body to go with food. I thought he had succeeded. A nice long finish,
My Islam is Pudding leaving behind his 13x
Anyway I had to go to Wales to retrieve Son-of-Furtheron for the Easter break. I did manage to find one service station with diesel before I left on Saturday morning. I decided given I didn't know if I could fill up anywhere that I'd drive a little more conservatively. I set a cruise at 68mph or a limit at same or 58mph depending on the road conditions and cruised a long. I got to Wales not that discernibly later than normal and it was all more relaxed as I wasn't trying to "make up time". I couldn't believe what my trip computer said - 68mpg! I did the same on the trip home although the Welsh not being as flipping stupid as the English had plenty of fuel everywhere it seemed so I did top up but I need not have bothered - still said 68mpg when I got back and I reckon on a tank I could get close to 1000miles! At least the 600+ round trip would have been doable. For a large family estate motor can't complain can you - my last trip where I pushed more I only got 55mpg and thought that good.
"December 13, 1920.
Olivia is incredible and she truly completes our family! She is a little chatter box and she is finally learning that crying gets her our undivided attention! Sadly for the first day or so she would cry but there were only heartbreaking,silent tears. Her tears were never met with comfort for the first 16 months of her life so she just learned various ways to sooth herself quietly:( Let me be the first to tell you, she's got LUNGS that now accompany those tears and she very clearly lets her needs be known!
This is the last post for my Photo a Day series for the month of April. I will have to decide if I want to continue this series for May. If you have an suggestions they would be appreciated. Do you like my series?
"There was nothing very interesting in the scenery of this day's journey, which brought us at midnight to Louisville. We slept at the Galt House; a splendid hotel; and were as handsomely lodged as though we had been in Paris, rather than hundreds of miles beyond the Alleghanies.
According to EMSI, location quotient is a ratio that compares a region to a larger reference region according to some characteristic or asset. Suppose X is the amount of manufacturing jobs in a region, and Y is the total amount of jobs in the region. X/Y is then the regional concentration of manufacturing jobs in the region.
Who said food blogging didn't get you anywhere?
everything that appears precarious
SCC: What I particularly like about this book is that it shows normal teenagers behaving and talking as they all do in 2012 – it’s refreshingly real. You’ve got right inside their heads, but it’s a brave (some would say risky) thing to do to portray them in all their unvarnished glory. Did you find it immensely freeing to let them swear, take drugs, have sex and drink? Or was it quite scary to write?
After one month of being held incommunicado, the Bahraini regime released Al Raas but with-held his passport. He is now stranded in Bahrain – without medication – pending a prosecution trial. On three dates in June, he was brought before a Military Court. It was during the opening hearing on 7 June that he first learnt of the charges against him.
So in the spirit of trying to curb my sweet tooth, I'm only going to allow myself to have ONE sweet this week. Yup only one. Well maybe two or three if I have something like a cookie or macaron... :)
As the Pope drove off, one of the loggers asked his buddies, 'Who was that guy?'
I am afraid the content of your character still takes a backseat to several things, your color, your gender, you economic status, you willingness to know your place and who you know.
The Director: Why is the name of Michael Curtiz still known to so few? It seems remarkable given the breadth and range of his output. Based for nearly thirty years at Warner Bros, from 1926 to 1953, he directed all their major stars and was instrumental in launching the careers of such varied actors as Errol Flynn, Doris Day and John Garfield. On top of which he also directed such solid gold classics as The Kennel Murder Case (1933), Captain Blood (1935), Angels with Dirty Faces, The Adventures of Robin Hood, Four Daughters (all 1938), Yankee Doodle Dandy (1942). After leaving the studio he was also responsible for such musicals as the blockbuster White Christmas (1954) and that fine Elvis vehicle, King Creole (1958). For his only Perry Mason movie he has the camera moving in almost every shot to keep the plot bubbling along, while transitions from one scene to the next are handled via an unusual use of zoom and dissolve created via an optical printer that was a real innovations at the time – it gets a little bit tiresome perhaps but it is certainly distinctive. There is much evidence of the director’s customary use of long shadows and a heavy emphasis on mirrors (which proves to be crucial to the plot anyway), making this another stylish little beauty and great fun too.
Mr Sheridan then asked specifically about Stephen Whittamore, whom the witnessed admitted using as he provided info that could help move stories on…the witness stating that Mr Whittamore was a resource used in general by the paper, but that he could not recall who had originally passed him the name of Mr Whittamore, but denied that it was Andy Coulson as he was not at the NoW at the time, and that it probably wasn’t Greg Miskiw either. Mr Sheridan finally asked what the witness knew of Mr Whittamore now, with the witness stating that he knew Mr Whittamore had been prosecuted for accessing data in breach of the data protection act.
This is Wyatt's friend Jason. He says his girlfriend
1. Add 3 to 4 tablespoons of cooking oil in a pot.
** Please note that in the picture here the straps on the car seat are not in the proper position, they should be equal with the armpits.
With chronic laryngitis, TB may be suspected. Using an instrument called a laryngoscope, a doctor can examine the airway for redness, swelling, small bumps of tissue called nodules, and irritated pits in the tissue called ulcerations. Special skin testing (TB testing) will reveal if the person has been exposed to TB.
My old tin mailbox holds shipping labels perfectly.
1 violating
Personally, I have a feeling that taking writing courses may also lead people on to bad writing because they might start to think there are rules.
I can't believe that I'm selling these two paintings because they were our first two pieces of art!
The highest ranking female officer in the #IDF is a Major General. #IDF #InternationalWomensDay The Middle East and the West Have the Same Problem: Liberty vs. Those Claiming a Monopoly on Truth Update: ~200 rioters hurled rocks at security forces in a violent, illegal riot near Qalandiya earlier today RT @AvitalLeibovich: The highest ranking female officer in the #IDF is a Major General. #IDF #InternationalWomensDay @deebo_ @Yisrael4Ever Sadly, Israeli civilians are forced to endure rocket attacks even on #Purim–this is the reality in #Israel. Whoop ‘em Ron How important is Jerusalem to Muslims?
“…Why don’t you lie on your back, rest on your elbows, and kind of drop your head back?” he said in response to her question.
“Last week we had the latest revelations from Parliament. The details might be new but the feelings they provoke are all too familiar. Disappointment. Despair. Even disgust. But as I argued in my speech at the Open University in May last year, anger at the expenses scandal is just the most forceful expression of a deep frustration people feel with our whole political system.
Although I took a several month break from the game and missed the introduction of Firelands, I’m glad I got the chance to see it. I never got to see Ragnaros in Molten Core, at least not when he was the Big Boss. I liked the environment and the fights, even if the instance and I had our disagreements. Plus:
If any of you out there still have your Mom, and she made anything, literally anything, for you at Christmas; or she made sure there was something under the tree for you; or she made the holidays merry even in simple little ways, do me a favor - go thank her profusely. Tell her how much you appreciate every little gesture.
Some simple embellishments, keeping it quite plain for a masculine card, finished it off.
I digress. Back to silencing dissent. The latest fun times involve the president of the United States of America whining that Fox News is being mean to him. This is embarrassing and incredibly stupid (as well as very smart, but I'll get to that part in a minute). Waaaaah, those meanies at Fox News are not being nice to me. Sniffle. So the BO administration wanders around the fringe media talk shows on Sunday morning berating Fox as an "arm of the Republican party" and cautioning the state-run media (ironic, right?) not to pick up any Fox stories. Um, like ACORN and Van Jones and the rest of the horrific news, real news, about BO and his fellow plotters. Of course this is simply too ridiculous for words, and any journalist in his or her right mind would immediately jump on this story and shout it from the rooftops as the assault on free speech that it is.
The new bureaucrat, who would not be directly elected by voters, is set to get sweeping control over the entire EU and force member countries into ever-greater political and economic union.
In the background I could hear Bertram telling me that he had not been able to complete his work on Earth and that he wanted so much to come out into the world and do more. That probably wasn’t the best thing to say to me; it only increased my resistance and caused me to react like, “Not on my time, buddy!” He seemed sincere and enthusiastic, though, and I wondered if my misgivings might be unfair to him. He was positively bursting with a desire to speak. I still kept my hold on Orion and on myself, refusing to let Bertram get the better of me, feeling like I was holding down the lid on a box of squirming animals that were all trying to escape. I had to wait for my turn to channel before I could let anyone speak anyway.
And she wonders what his wife must be like
Article 63
* See you pace at each mile
“Excuse me?” Janette’s voice sounded angry and she seemed very offended.
For a few seconds I forget to breathe. I am numb except for my heart struggling wildly against my ribcage. He watches me – is he seeking my approval? - is he afraid? We’re not to hide behind the platitudes claiming the inevitability of death in war or the healing power of time. All we have is here, is us.
Hellooo ......everybody, wishing you all Happy Valentine Day !!
It is time our retailers stopped selling books on a ‘no risk, sure we can return them to the wholesalers in three months’ basis, and, perhaps then, they might invest more time into the buying needs and comforts of the public when they enter a bookstore to experience the gift of reading.
If curry is our national dish in Britain, as some maintain, then the traditional drink to partner it is lager – although perhaps for authenticity it ought to be India Pale Ale. For most people even the suggestion of something other than beer with a curry often produces incredulity.
There's a good chance you may have seen Rob Ryan's work already. Greetings cards, posters, mugs, cushions, book covers, umbrellas, bags, and even vases and crockery have all been emblazoned with his distinctive paper-cut designs in gift ranges at stores like Liberty and Heals. He even has his own shop on London's Columbia Road where his work can be seen in many forms. There's no substitute for seeing one of his extraordinarily intricate paper-cuts in the flesh, even the mass-produced card I bought for my recent anniversary is a tactile beauty and the detail of some of his larger works is truly staggering.
Like grotesque mouths,
Leah Georgana Reynolds, 45, of Sarasota, pulled the victim’s hair and hit her in the face when she heard the victim had no money, the report states.
I am so excited to participate in the JustRite Blog Hop... I have had a chance to work with their products through CPS and jumped on the chance to participate in this hop!
We mustn’t, just mustn’t, we mustn’t be slow.
No wonder countless parents experience a sense of dread when their child is invited to yet another birthday party. Ugh, another gift to go pick up, more money to spend, another Saturday afternoon of would-be family time shot. I thought birthdays were supposed to be fun.
The era of the Big Newspaper, of His Girl Friday and Call Northside 777, has given way to the Digital Age of content democratization, but a good writer still needs an editor. Whether you’re writing a book, old school journalism, short pieces for a website, a missive to a staff or board, or a script for a commercial, you want someone else looking at it before you unleash it upon your audience.
And oh, by the way. Memorial Day? Just about the time my second red pen ran out of ink, got an invite for a last minute barbeque at a friend’s house. It was goddamn delicious. In every possible way.
Now when I read the Psalm of Nephi, a new picture emerges.
See that the first apple is in focus and the other two are a bit blurred? This shot is taken with F5.6.
This past Saturday (28 April 2012) Pauli and I drove to Zurich to see them in concert again. It was part of Loudfest and held in Komplex No. 457. We left Lugano at around 09:40 and had a really pleasant sunny drive in our rented red convertable SmartCar. Just the drive there was magical. We arrived in Zurich and parked around 13:00, and headed over to the venue where we waited with some other concert-goers/Simple Plan fans until the doors opened and we were allowed inside. Before the concert, WTK did walk by and Pauli got a high-five from Danny.
of ache and longing
wait said the fly
At the precise moment Wayne would be there to unleash the rage that had built up inside him. Tightening like the coiled spring of a wind-up doll, the fury within became increasingly taut with every memory of her humiliating rejection.
Must have experience with young children with autism and implementation of treatment protocols.
Ana’s Subconscious
Discover More Creativity
The knife cuts the steak. He takes his time doing it, cutting it into pieces, arranging it on his plate in the faint hope that the extra time will allow his stomach to digest the meat already in it. To make room.
BTW, look at the temperature to your right! It is a wonderfully cool day in the Desert Southwest! You can bet your lucky stars we won't be seeing many more (if any) days like this in the near future. The dreaded heat of the summer is fast approaching and we had our first 100 degree day just 2 days ago. But Oh I forgot! It's a dry heat, LOL!
It’s an inspiring, thought provoking and open first section, with nice chunky quotes from writers and really lacking in rules – a few self help style statements: ‘Trust your inner truth and be brave enough to stand up to it’ but hey, sometimes we need clichés: ‘ Taking risks in life can boost your confidence and creativity in writing too.’ (Goldman)
An add a nice crumbly cookie with a dollop of cream cheese, butter and my chunky strawberry jam piled on and u have an energy infusing go getter for the whole day....with delicious buttery goodness.....
it will never be mine.
2 wheels
You regularly draw attention to yourself. Perhaps you should ask yourself why.
The vessel needed to make the changes you desire is staring you in the face every time you look in the mirror.
— A rule valid for most multiplayer games, that you shouldn’t forget when you’re attacking: if you’re having trouble piercing the enemy lines, don’t insist too much losing tickets, try another way instead. That can be the opposite side of the camp, sneaking from behind or maybe by creating a diversion (eg. with smoke).
(3) The Bible is not a book at all, in the usual sense of the term, but an anthology—a set of selections from a library of religious and nationalistic writings produced over a period of some one thousand years. The Bible cannot have the kid of unity that we normally expect in a book from our own period.
6) Events at the American Church in Paris and the American Cathedral in Paris
Breathe deeply. Organize your thoughts before moving on them. Just say no to stress and anxiety. It may be impossible to completely eliminate stress since it is part of our challenging generation, but try to keep it down as much as possible. Stress may bring your memory into its inefficient level. Avoid saying to yourself: You might forget things, because you don’t have to. Forgetting is often a choice. There’s no need to assume you will forget anything. You just have to give your brain what it needs.
Olympic hurdler
Stephen Simon (Executive Producer) has produced such films as “Somewhere in Time” and “What Dreams May Come” and is the author of “The Force is With You: Mystical Movie Messages That Inspire Our Lives.”
The Federal Tax Code has had over 3500 tax law changes since 2000. It is also incredible to note that it takes the average taxpayer 23 hours to prepare, document and do their 2011 tax returns. It takes even longer to do, 32 hours, if you add schedule C or schedule E.
I was also not listening to my body. I've always been opposed to running streaks because people will run no matter how horrible they feel, not wanting to break their streak. I see now that mileage goals are no better. My goal of 1,000 miles for the year is what blinded me to what I was doing to myself. I didn't want to fall behind on my mileage when I had already lost some ground in the previous week due to the move. Physically, I could easily have cut back on miles and still been gaining conditioning because of the hills, but I was so determined to keep my numbers pumped up that I ignored my better sense and kept going.
I absolutely loved this book! I can't wait to read Black Heart, which is the final book in the trilogy, because I know that it's going to be amazing!
I really love having flowers growing in my yard that I can bring inside and use to brighten up my place for free. Maybe even more than that, I love finding things growing in my yard that I always thought of as just plants that can actually be cut and used in arrangements in ways I didn't think possible before.
This was my cue to act impressed, but I generally passed.
Speaking of Groupon and their friends…these can make AWESOME gifts. You know how sometimes you see something that you’d like to do but you don’t really want to spend YOUR money on it? I’m sure Mom feels the same way! But she’d love to be gifted that parasailing coupon, that city tour, that wine tasting event, that facial and blow dry combo, that brunch/lunch/dinner at a new restaurant, those concert tickets, that festival entrance, that Pilates class and so on and so forth.
get the looks yourself:
Economic theories:
Though you try
they could make a clean break
I’m numb. I’m lonely. Haven’t felt this alone since….whenever. I really want to lie in my bed and be held by loving, reassuring arms. I want someone to watch over me and protect me.
The government media at the time were used to the brim to humiliate the royalties. TV stations repeatedly showed old Malay movies depicting the “foolishness” of sultans of the past. Their newspapers flashed ignoble news disparaging families of royalties. And royalties were not given any chance to refute or defend themselves against all those allegations.
How about for those interested in writing a sequel to a previous novel?
13. Mon Poulet, Ma Cocotte
And: Jesus is real! As evil recognized Jesus, so should we.
But in closing, let us look at Memela as he muddles up to the finishing line: “Let us leave the blacks to be true to themselves by creating a new human race.”
"Look at the bright side. We don't have a snow day, but at least we have a four-day week next week."
Being out here in Kyushu, at amusement parks around all these high schoolers, makes me really stand out. I believe I was the only foreigner at both parks, and the kids loved to wave and say hello. One boy told me he loved me as he passed by on a chairlift today. Three 20-something ladies waved at me as I rode a coaster. Being foreign kind of makes me a celebrity around here! A preschooler even said "bye bye" to me as she exited a bus this week. At the same time, standing out makes it hard to just blend in.
I know longer live my male self in the world, chemo is being scheduled and I am looking forward to the spring dances coming up. There is the place I get the most excitement, being lead by a man dancing. The last one I attended a waitress thought I was a girlfriend to someone there, a natural woman and made me gush.
I would favor a well-written amendment to assert Ohio's sovereignty, and this one comes closer; but it needs the hand of an attorney who is skilled in constitutional law.
“Over this weekend, Congress will forge a responsible path forward,” Boehner said in a statement.
Match ratings
yesterday’s postcard poem on its way to Atlanta, Georgia
03 Deep Water 05:39
I don't know if you saw this but Webster's is having a Clean and Simple DT call. Details are here. If you are like me and love Webster's but use their products in a more simple fashion than you need to apply. Brandin is one of the nicest people I have ever met, it's family owned business and their products knock my socks off ;) They are beyond generous and foster a fun loving atmosphere.
2. Fruit. I have yet to meet a fruit I didn't like. I might not adore some kinds, but I like most. Favorites are blueberry's, strawberry's and oranges.
Sweets or better said, dessert is one of the most interesting part of a breakfast, lunch or dinner. There are sweets that represent real masterpieces, not only because of their aspect, but also for their delightful taste. While trying to enjoy eating your favourite cakes of chocolates, you might think about how many calories does it contains. Nevertheless, even if sweets are more caloric that a plate of pasta, they do perform a double function: feeding and enjoying in the same time. We shouldn’t forget that in the process of preparing any kind of dessert we use ingredients which often provides necessary for nutrition elements. So, in a good dessert you can find carbohydrates, proteins, lipids, mineral salts and vitamins, strictly required for our body. This way, to improve the stability of our body and mental welfare, sweets must be introduced in our daily alimentation, in moderate quantities.
Make a hole in each using your thumb and place back on the counter, covered, to rise.
She almost asked becoming what before stopping herself. Instead she smiled and said simply, “Thank you.”
Building capacity for flexible skills development
They were aware of the risks associated with working in the area. They had accepted those risks because of their love for Christ and for the Afghan people. We are again reminded of the ruthless nature of the Taliban, and our need to pray for Christians around the world who may live, or work, in areas that are hostile to Christianity.
Stress, unfortunately, has become fairly commonplace in our everyday lives today. So you need to learn how to manage it when it occurs. What do you find works? Is it deep breaths, going for a walk around your office or the block, giving your dog (or cat a hung), or simply talking to a friend? Find what works for you (or a combination of things) and then do that. The key here is to manage your stress before it manages you. You’re too young to be shopping for headstones right….RIGHT?!?!
However matters began to unravel soon after. The Committee realised that either Clemens, or McNamee, or indeed both, were lying to them. The committee insisted on an investigation and now, just over three years later, Clemens has appeared in a Washington court room for trial.
Oval words: Lil Davis
Tailored element wristbands are not a cut fundraising statement anymore they are close billboards.
2. He had wine with His meals,
of project ;)
Maybe it's the hint of spring in the air; it has certainly perked me up a bit. I worked on quite a few things the last couple of days. I finished attaching the binding for my Bewitched quilt. I still have to take pictures, but will have to take Blessings of Spring down off my quilt rack/shelf first. :)
Honestly, I chose this beer because of the packaging. Being a designer, when I have trouble picking out a new beer to try, I gravitate towards the best designed package. This can has a fun little cartoonish take on the "hop crisis" of a few years ago when the prices soared, almost crippling the beer industry. Described by the brewery as an:
"I think acting is as important as singing. Years ago, you could have fat singers who didn’t move much on stage but had wonderful voices and everyone was happy. Now people expect more.” Jenis is interested in the way small details and movement can make a characterization stronger. “I search every role to find moments when I can express things better”. Sometimes it’s as simple as changing position subtly. “I don’t like to be like a machine, doing exactly the same thing every time”, he says. “In life, things change all the time”. This keeps performance fresh and natural. “Even when we’re not singing, there is a connection between singers, which an audience can feel very clearly”.
"I wouldn't last five minutes. I'll take my chances here." The mere thought of entering the Second Realm now left him wincing, his eyes screwed shut. When he opened them again, there was a figure stepping out of a gateway in the door. Silver skin caught glints of yellow and orange from the remaining torches, and no human ever had a neck so long.
Knowledge can be gleaned from books, from hearing others talk, from copying. But understanding, whilst it might start off that way, is something much deeper.
R&D program ended, Rubinstein, beginning in January 1988, discovered the substantially purified protein and the specific amino acid sequence described in claims 2 and 3 of the '701 patent. Rubinstein then assigned his ownership rights to Yeda. Rubinstein was not required to assign his ownership share to IBEP under the Sub-R&D Contract, and Yeda properly became a co-owner of the patent by virtue of claims 2 and 3. Even assuming IBEP has co-ownership of the patent under the Sub-R&D Contract because claim 1 was discovered in 1987, the district court properly ruled that IBEP has at most a pro rata undivided ownership interest in the ’701 patent pursuant to the Sub-R&D Contract’s assignment clause. Rubinstein’s assignee, Yeda, also owns at least a pro rata undivided ownership interest in the whole ’701 patent and throughout the two appeals has made it quite clear that it wants no part of the litigation. Without a complete ownership interest or the voluntary joinder of Yeda, IBEP lacks standing to sue for infringement.
“The Supreme Court has positioned itself to improve the quality of the criminal justice process from beginning to end,” said Hofstra law Prof. Eric Freedman. The court also has a number of First Amendment cases and potentially deciding the legality of President Obama’s health care program. For now, with a relative absence of major civil cases, the justices are focused on criminal ones, especially concerning the Fourth Amendment’s protections against unreasonable searches and the Sixth Amendment’s guarantee of a fair trial.
6.Cover the butter with the dough.
My progress is "miraculous". This from a medical doctor. It's as though Glinda the Good Witch of the East touched my brain with her magic wand of calm and contentment. I may not be quite back to my old self yet, but I'm not far off. A few more days and I'll find out what happens when I surpass my old self and go even further away from fear, if that's in the cards.
5. The increased trend for enormous advances and bidding wars between large publishers for the most sought after writers.
It was like the words hit me in the face. He wasn’t even talking about me, but thank goodness he said it! It changed everything for me right then, like a whirlwind my thoughts
I found a Charles Scholten on Ancestry.com in 1863 age 24, residence Campbell Missouri and occupation artist. This was a Civil War draft record. I also found a Charles Scholten in the 1880 Springfield, Mo census, age 41 occupation saloon keeper, married to Clara, three children Rosa E, age 14, Henry age 10 and Neva age 8.
It was a coincidence that Zampano and I went there late one night and we had read something about dragons spawning but had no idea what they would do, or do anything at all. When we arrived there were a few Fey-Drunk Darters there and more spawned. We sat there a while and just looked at them, when they suddenly flew towards the ring of mushrooms and started channeling these golden beams towards a portal in the center called Faerie Circle. The music changed and notes appeared over their heads like they were singing, this beautiful and mysterious and magical song. Never heard anything like it before. The deers in the forest gathered around to watch. It lasted for about 2-3 minutes, then they despawned.
See, I never want my kids to think there is a topic that is off limits to talk about in our family.
(from Katy's letter)
I wish I had’ve known what my passion was…I’ve tried so many different techniques, but have always gone back to stamps and ink. Keep it simple,
So today, I was at a conference and this woman asked me if my pregnancy was an accident or planned. Umm what??? So I looked at her and said "it doesn't really matter at this point, does it?" You'd be proud of me lovelies, other than this statement to this heffer, I held my tongue. No comment on her weight or her jacked up weave. I turned my back and attempted to drop the 'leave me alone' hint to her (she sat right next to me during this workshop). She then proceeded to tell me that she has 'been there, done that' as far as pregnancy and that her husband wants a baby boy and she will probably end up having one for him. Blah. blah, blah. OMG!!!! I had to get up and leave her presence while she was in mid sentence about something I didn't want to hear about. I didn't see her for the rest of the day.
When I am trying to sleep.
Dr. Jean Muench from Marietta, Florida brings 18 years of pediatric experience to her second volunteer mission with HOPE. She is serving as a pediatrician aboard the USS Iwo Jima and ashore in Costa Rica and Guatemala.
1/3 cup cognac
Daniel Dragomirescu, El Diablo y el Hombre de Dios/
There is nothing more humiliating than being topless in the backseat of your boyfriend’s car when someone decides to throw an egg at the windshield.
It would be great to pack the event with eager writers looking for inspiration and socialising. If the worst comes to the worst, at least there will be an unending supply of alcohol.
1/2 C. + 1 Tbsp. Let’s Do…Organic coconut flour, sifted
These aren’t spoilers, but general indications of plot points to give you an idea: bodily mutilation, drug-taking (and by a religious figure!), casual sex, assault, mental illness/instability, marital infidelity and prostitution… all infect the episodes.
brain, and I've always been obsessed with the fact that you can just
‘next morning my mistress set about instructing me in my tasks. She taught me to do all sorts of household work; to wash and bake, pick cotton and wool, and wash floors, and cook. And she taught me (how can I ever forget it!) more things than these; she caused me to know the exact difference between the smart of the rope, the cart-whip, and the cow-skin, when applied to my naked body by her own cruel hand. And there was scarcely any punishment more dreadful than the blows I received on my face and head from her hard heavy fist. She was a fearful woman, and a savage’ enslaver (Mary Prince (1837).
The title says it all. I simply love these shoes. They allow me to feel the ground, help me adopt a more efficient stride whilst cushion my feet from the hard pavement pounding.
From Ghazi Air Base in Pakistan, modified MH-60 helicopters flew to the suburb of Abbottabad, where Bin Laden’s acre-large million dollar compound was located, about 30 miles from the center of Islamabad. Aboard these helicopters were Navy SEALS, tactical signals, intelligence collectors, and navigators using highly classified hyperspectral imagers. After a 40 minute firefight, 22 people were killed or captured and the face of terror, Osama bin Laden, was shot dead. He took two shots to the left side of his face. His body was placed aboard the choppers that made the trip back. His DNA was later matched to DNA taken from one of his sisters who had died of brain cancer in Boston. There were no injuries or casualties among the SEAL team.
What consistencies have you kept over the years?
M577A3 Armoured Personnel Carrier: Tank; BS 4; F 11, S 11, R 10; Capacity 13
Well think again because when a collection like BCBG Max Azria is devoted almost entirely to color blocking, it is a fashion statement that will be around for a while longer. I was fascinated that the colors and designs explored color blocking in many different combinations - it ranged from vertical and horizontal combinations in different neutral colors to a fun mix with different textures. The same color (white) paired with a sheer white to create a different textural view or a simple color blocked coat was mixed with fur sleeves for a modern spin on a retro look. I thought that this was also a look that works for warmer as well as cooler weathers.
Two top executives at Susan G. Komen for the Cure have announced their resignation, amid reports that the breast cancer charity is struggling to raise money and repair its reputation after its decision to defund Planned Parenthood and subsequent reversal.
Imagine the turmoil.
Some have said that Matt Smith was trying too hard to be like the Tenth Doctor, and I did see some mannerisms that lingered at first. However, as the story progressed, it became clear (at least to me), that what Smith was doing was portraying a character regeneration as well as a physical one. By the time he had stripped off - yummily - and changed into his bow tie 'n' braces attire, he was very much his own man. This theory of mine was backed up in The Beast Below, in which, from the start, the Doctor felt like a very new character who we were getting to know. And I was loving it!
So here's what I used -
**I will no longer be posting my blogs for Rhino’s journey under Daily Dose, it will just be under the Rhino’s Jounery tab and then under the weekly tab.
- Remembering my Fortune. Not in a Pollyanna, everything-is-wonderful-all-the-time kind of way, but consciously thinking about the good things in my life. A reminder of how fortunate we are, from Danniel Dennet’s Freedom Evolves:
Yes, the art stroll has been canceled for today to the the forecasted imminent storms on their way. I am so sorry! I was very excited about the show and I know a lot of you were too =( But it really is best that all of us artists don't get our work ruined by rain, electrocuted, or blown into the lake, honest.
So for this series, I plan on looking at the individual character movies and how they have set things up for when the call goes out: Avengers Assemble.
I was the pilot of that “slick” which had received major damage to the tail-rotor drive shaft from a lucky enemy rifle shot. The maintenance team at the staging area inspected and determined that a one-time flight back to base camp would be okay but grounded the aircraft after that. Upon arriving back at Soc Trang, I informed Martha (she came right up to us and asked how things were going) that we had a gunship down in the combat area and additional efforts were being made to extract the crew. I don’t recall if we had received word of the death of the pilot at that time. Martha stated that she and her troupe would remain until everyone returned from the mission. As there were no replacements, the servicemen could not return to the mission. While the servicemen waited, Raye played poker with them and helped to keep everyone’s spirits up. I enjoyed playing cards with Martha but regretted it somewhat. It appears that she had plenty of practice playing poker with GIs during her USO service in multiple wars. But I still love her for who she was and what she did. When the mission was completed, which had resulted in the loss of a helicopter, gunship and a Viking pilot, there was also an officer, the Major who was in command of the Vikings who had been wounded when the ship went down. He was flying pilot position but was not in control of the ship when the command pilot, a Warrant Officer, was shot. When he and the two remaining crewmen were returned to Soc Trang, Raye volunteered to assist the doctor in treating the wounded flyer. When all had been completed, Raye waited until everybody was available and then put on her show. Everyone involved appreciated her as an outstanding trouper and a caring person. During the Vietnam War, she was made an honorary Green Beret because she visited United States Army Special Forces in Vietnam without fanfare, and she helped out when things got bad in Special Forces A-Camps. As a result, she came to be known affectionately by the Green Berets as “Colonel Maggie.”[3]
1 bunch carrots with stems and greens
Well of course it's true I do love pink, I also find great quiet and calm in a nearly all white atmosphere. I've had a very hard few weeks. One half of my comedy duo of Bogie and Bacall has passed on. He brought us many hours of being a clown and a love. He is missed terribly. They were brought home together and stayed that way for 15 years. We also have a wee little dynamo named Skye. She tries to comfort her sister but Bacall just isn't herself. I know most of you love your fur babies way beyond the average pet and owner relationship .
105) The only bone I have ever broken is one of my ribs. I originally broke it during a coughing fit one of the many times I had pneumonia and bronchitis, and then I broke it again during sex with the ex-fiance.
Mellira coughed. “Wentworth. John Wentworth.”
Here are just some of the records:
And I can always feel your warmth
But know this: If you change your core values, they were never real values; they were just fancy marketing tools and gimmicks.
I spotted an elevator and an old geezer down the hall just stumbling out of his door. I thought if I ran fast enough I could keep my back to him, and at the same time apply the treatment to that area. Which I did, and than ran back to stand beside my brother, watching to see what would happen. Terry had witnessed exactly what I had accomplished and was grinning and slobbering gleefully.
They are binding up their hearts away from breaking,
JonnyBeers and I were invited to the official Steam Whistle Draught Launch in BC at The Bimini of Donnelly Group and of course we weren’t going to turn down the opportunity to enjoy a free pint!
And what is even more amazing about these special people is that they don’t see or realize the value that they are giving me. While they may feel stuck in a place they don’t want to be, while they may not able to get themselves moving, they get me moving and rekindle my inner sprit.
3rd Tab – ETC.
I hope they are used for shooting and hunting and enjoyed as much as "My friend" and I did.
Click the hotlink aloft to download the latest adventure of the Bold Nutz Podcast, or subscribe by exhausted HERE!
DCWV Embellishments
We see this in Jennifer Pahlka, founder of Code For America, which connects young tech professionals with the needs of city governments. And Charles Best, founder of DonorsChoose, which connects donors to underprivileged schools. There’s Ben Berkowitz, who launched SeeClickFix, the site that connects people with non-emergency problems in their neighborhoods–such as a broken street lamp or potholed road–with others who can chime in with solutions. And Jacqueline Novogratz, founder of Acumen Fund, which combines financial expertise with empathy, investing in startups around the world that help improve the lives of people unable to do so on their own.
I didn't even make it through his entire thirty minute presentation in the hour and a half I spent working on my painting. To be fair, I did spent some of that time learning the ins and outs of cleaning my brushes and he had several on hand.
So this is my project, I'm not sure if it's vintage maybe if I roughed up the edges and inked it up a bit, but I like it this way. It says Believe, Love, Dream, Prosperity. I used the Pagoda cartridge in the Cricut Craft Room on my E2. If you would like the cut file for ccr I will be happy to share, let me know.
I last visited Mexico’s Yucatan Peninsula in 1975, when my husband and I spent our honeymoon there. We were poor, ill-prepared and rode buses to the ruins of Chichen Itza and slept in hammocks at Isla Mujeres. Since development at Cancun only began in 1970, there were just a handful of hotels and about that many tourists. When I returned this summer to the now named Mayan Riviera for a family wedding, I was dumbstruck by the changes.
And THANK YOU to Carolyn Tyler of KGO News for bringing this story out in the media and let's hope that something actually comes from this.
Telepathy...I could avoid a person based on their thought process.
It was at Gatwick Airport some 14 months ago when catching the connecting flight to Glasgow have arrived overnight from Florida. I was tired and jet-lagged and a bit grumpy. I noticed that a new edition of Q was out on the shelf, and I picked it up to have a look at what they had listed as their '50 Ultimate British Songs'.
You are a talented child. Believe in yourself more and you’ll do all right. You might think that you ain’t got the looks and there are prettier girls out there, but remember – this is the best you’ll ever look (:)) and second, beauty is transient. There’s no point being an empty-brain bimbo that will look wide eyed at any man and fade away into the crowd by the time she’s 25. If possible, try to change highschools. I know you hate it now and you’ll hate it even more in the next years. If you can’t change schools, take some karate lessons and beat the crap of BB. He deserves it for the ass that he was and will be. I know - I have met him again after years and years and he still thinks that tormenting you day after day has been “fun” and that we “had laughs” together.
She'll let you take her home
pistachio soup, French onion soup, fish chowder, pumpkin and sweet potato
Chilly sauce, 2 table spoons
'Is this your thimble?' the Lord asked.
Online platform - $3999
Technology has given us the ability to breathe lifelikeness into a person whose soul has long since departed. God knows the paths we walk and when we are to walk no longer. Whenever we stand in the stead of God, no matter how innocently nor unawares, we simply prove that He is and we are not.
sour cream, and vanilla. Mix for a couple of minutes or until the ingredients are smooth and creamy. Whisk the eggs in a medium bowl and then add them to the cream cheese mixture. Blend the mixture just enough to incorporate the eggs. Add the zest and lime juice and mix slowly until the juice is fully incorporated into the mixture.
Tickets, Wrist band, etc. I had no problem with the rules, regulations or price.
What happens is that one person in the partnership, usually the wife, gets insight into the harm done to kids by parents with a controlling mindset and we see examples all around us of this scenario, so then when we see our partners parenting this way (the same as they always have), it suddenly isn't "good enough" any more. We've often been thinking and reading about this for years, but our partners are playing catch up and usually too busy with work to read up about it as much anyway. And when we keep sending them links or books to read, it can actually be a means of us trying to control them, to make them agree with us.
If this was supposed to be a girlfriend novel then I want more depth and more likable characters…not just a martyr and a bitch. It took them too long to reach a reconciliation point with too much tell and not enough show along the way. And *Spoiler Alert* At the end of the book I still have no idea why everyone pitied Michelle over Carly.
If that wasn’t enough, in an article appearing in The Daily Mail, the Navy SEALs attacked Barack Obama for using them as “ammunition” and taking all the credit in the killing of Bin Laden.
Some mothers of babies with clefts have commented that their children didn't start eating great until after their cleft repairs - but since Maddy's cleft repair will be delayed until she is about two years old, we need to learn to work with it. (I don't want her eating purees until she's two!) The occupational therapist suggested getting a palatal obturator made to close the cleft so she can eat without food going into the nasal cavity, so we have a referral to dentist for that.
“Oh! I should probably check to make sure I look alright!”
The food and beverage companies want you to buy and eat their products, so just like everything today, they supersize it to make you feel like you’re getting the most bang for your buck. But think about it – are you? Is an all-you-can-eat buffet really a win? Certainly not to your health or booty!
To learn more about the Make Life Better Transformation, read about the science behind the experience, familiarize yourself with the role of your personal coach, and listen to the many success stories included on this site.
Everyone – from the authorities to the citizens – is going the extra mile to accomodate the event. The transport secretary has announced the scrapping of guidelines for special occasions like street parties to facilitate local communities intending to hold Royal Wedding Street Festivals during the joyous day. Countless Londoners will be leasing their rooms out for those who will be journeying to London to attend the wedding personally.
Ay-yi-yi, so they make a big production out of the shirtless girl's boyfriend saying the name...4 times. Clara then tells him to go downstairs and wait for her, while she gets completely undressed for him. The second he gets to the couch, she says "Candyman", at which point a slash mark appears in the ceiling above the couch, and blood starts splashing the boyfriend. Uh, say what now? He only said the name 4 times, and she said it once. Neither one of them actually completed the full 5 times by themselves, so how does that work? If I say "Candyman" once, then 4 other people across the world say it once, which one of us does he kill? We're 5 minutes in, and I'm already tired of this film...and this was one I used to love.
Prism Simply Smooth this is VERY smooth. color may not evenly go through the back. Color shows up vibrant and smooth but blending is a little different than on other papers (you really have to try it to understand. People either swear by it or swear at it)
All is well.
died, 1.
Here I am behind on the A to Z Challenge again. It's okay. At least I am doing it, right? I can't help but think, though, that I was meant to wait for E until today. After all, it is Easter, right? Some of my favorite memories are from our Easters when I was a child.
can immediately apply to our blogs?
From prime time documentaries about “undateable” people and autism, through to sitcoms from world-renowned comedians, disability is currently more visible on TV than ever before.
And what a sight it was. The white stone of them main gate seemed to glisten in the morning sun, reflecting back at them. It stretched tall, taller than anything Creme had seen before, even the Abbey where they would sometimes go and Creme had thought that was super tall.
May their souls be at the right hand of God
ATTORNEY: Do you know if your daughter has ever been involved in voodoo?
What draws you to write in m/m romance genre?
soo true, since Beau injected a little kindness I find myself a better mother, better friend, its easier to make friends, and only after I became a more kind version of the old me did I truly learn to be happy for others. It seriously took me more than twenty years to discover that joy! I'm hoping to work on this kindness thing because so far it seems like a pretty good deal. According to the Love Dare, kindness has 4 parts= gentleness, willingness, initiative, and helpfulness. It then shares the story of the good samaritan (Luke ch10). Basically a show of kindness, increased by being unexpected or even undeserved. Kindness in its sincerest form is given out of love, not in return or after the fact. So be the one to smile first, serve first, greet first and most importantly forgive first! and on that note.....
Competitions always give you the opportunity to work with a purpose. They can become almost like creative writing exercises. You also have a deadline to write to and some specific submission criteria. This gives a framework that reflects what happens generally in the industry.
Arms (make 2)
This is when I begun developing my love for Strategy in Marketing and Advertising and also this is where I learnt what are insights and what is their importance in a communication process. During my time in Ogilvy I also worked as an account executive for several brands in ATL, BTL and Direct and Digital Marketing Actions.
for my steps the front one has a Magnolia Doo Hickey lovely fence die on it which I have edged with vintage photo distress ink then I've embellished this with white rose ribbon which I've added some small pearls too, some butterflies and the swirl is a Magnolia Doo Hickey heart swirl die, also on this step is Tilda with lovely lace shoes,
75%: Americans Who Describe The Condition Of The Economy As Either "Very Bad" Or "Fairly Bad." ( CBS/The New York Times Poll , 1009A,MoE3%, 3/7-11/12)
Stephanie Lee Mudge — Assistant Professor of Sociology
Going on rides in the car
But then you need to drop the whole concept of a dark savage age where a few independent city states struggle for survival because when players can go to a magic shop and pick up an enchanted sword, if the local government isn't doing something with that magic to safeguard the people in the first place, that logic is flawed.
In that light, I'm sorry to say it's still a bit depressing when I try to imagine what it was like to be pain free and have abundant energy. And it's not a little bit selfish, I reckon.
She stayed, of course. She was as good and faithful as the breed is known for. She was never too exuberant or too shy or too anything. She was just a really good dog. In those years with small boys I had much less time to bond with dogs, of course.
Suddenly see your face
Some websites might appear blank or might not display correctly in Windows Internet Explorer. For example, portions of a webpage might be missing, info in a table might be in the wrong locations, or colors and text might be incorrect. Some webpages might not display at all.
When it comes to celebrities, it is only slightly more iffy; but most people probably reckon invasion of privacy comes with being a celeb… and they enjoy reading the resultant titillation.
My will to live returned again,
Smith, along with his charismatic bandmates Pat Brown (Guitar/Lead Vocals), Nate Flynn (Bass), Ben Peterson (Keys) and Chris Lee (Drums), will hit the road with Valencia beginning August 27th in Baltimore followed by a headlining tour and opening support for Cobra Starship this fall.
And the faith that I find;
Jodi Wilton
You can listen to a podcast edition of this review, together with my look ahead to the clutch of presidential movies on the horizon, by following this link: http://www.cyberears.com/index.php/Show/audio/5984
For those of you who have been reading this for a while now, you’ll have read my thoughts at various stages over the second half of my PhD in Classics. From start to submission last November it took just on 4.5 years, about average for a thesis in the Humanities. It felt much longer than that I can assure you. Well, the good news is that yesterday I got the letter I was waiting for saying that it had passed. A PhD thesis is marked by two anonymous examiners and one of them had wanted revisions so this letter confirmed that the revisions had been accepted. The examination itself took about 9 months in all and for the last few weeks I had been checking the mail eagerly anticipating this letter.
Posted by Patrick & Amanda at 4:44 PM 1 comments
We are almost to the 30 week landmark!! 30 weeks is when we can (pretty much) start counting down in single digits. It's also when things most likely begin to get uncomfortable, but that just means baby is getting bigger and preparing for his/her arrival.
Level 14: MP Cost: 32, Duration: 144 seconds, Defense: +70%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +42%, Elemental Resistance: +42%.
-Don’t complain or whine when you are talking to people. Keep the conversation positive because otherwise you will likely be a huge turnoff.
It added that such schools will increase the investment potential for the project, as they “traditionally bring about increased rental demand for housing nearby”.
NXCMS Blog (nxcmsblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
letting others upload photos,
Tracking Tristano's time signatures and deciphering a pair of Matt Otto's original compositions taxed my atrophied brain. Concentrating on a Crosscurrent performance is akin to winding one's way through a meditation maze. At the conclusion of Wednesday's labyrinth-like concert, I was almost too exhausted to check my cellphone to get the latest update on Kim Kardashian.
Please make dua for me and all the believers.
Now to the bye-bye part of the post. As most of you know, Borders Books is in Chapter 11 and restructuring in hopes of avoiding a total bankruptcy. Well, our local Borders is one of the stores being liquidated. We popped in there tonight and the place looked as if it had been looted! It made me incredibly sad to wander around the shelves where I used to spend hours browsing and see things scattered here and there but most everything gone. Then I started to feel the irony of it all... Remember when Borders or its brother Barnes moved into YOUR neighborhood? Think back... it's been awhile since they became the big boys on the block. They pushed out almost all the little indy-booksellers and edged out all the competition as soon as they rolled into town with their flashy storefronts, cozy chairs, and delectable coffees and goodies. We all ran to them like crazy and the little guys were left behind. Isn't it incredible that the big box boys are being marginalized by something that comes in a little box? Welcome to the next era of books... and small booksellers. Now that we can get anything (practically) that we want on an e-reader; we may find ourselves having to go back to the little bookshops that are left when we want to buy an ACTUAL book! Now, THAT, my friends is irony! Excuse me now, I have a new book on my Kindle that I am dying to get started!
I am starting with plain dal. This is a quick fix meal. With real big flavor and a healthy plate of meal. I often make this when i am in a hurry or in the middle of some other dish. It tastes real good with ghee and pappad. And kids would love this too. My son likes this with ghee and a spoon of rasam. So here goes the recipe.
God is our refuge and strength, an ever-present help in trouble. Therefore we will not fear, though the earth give way and the mountains fall into the heart of the sea, though its waters roar and foam and the mountains quake with their surging. There is a river whose streams make glad the city of God, the holy place where the Most High dwells. God is within her, she will not fall; God will help her at break of day. (Psalm 46:1-5 NIV)
Add the onions into the melted butter and olive oil in the frying pan, keep stirring around with the spatula so the onions do not burn.
My planning included eating a significant breakfast each day. If I eat a large breakfast I tend to eat less the rest of the day. This is one of those items I learned about myself thanks to keeping a food journal. I also planned to limit my alcohol consumption to a specific beverage.
Gregory: so you say
- Greenfield Chilongo (Executive Director, Zimcopy, Zimbabwe)
Seller's description: A vigorous, stout growing rose whose glossy dark green leaves and long lasting brilliant orange blooms croon a sweet tune in the garden; long cutting stems, and excellent disease resistance; stunning when massed along borders.
gels
We are the Sherlock Holmes English-speaking vernacular,
I've also been busy squirrelling away jhoozing up author David Gaffney's website copy- and layout/navigation-wise (it needed some streamlining), and you can now feast your eyes upon my hours of toil here. I'm pretty pleased with the end result, and David hasn't yet ex-communicated me, so I guess he's ok with it too. So, if you need a website planning and writing and even building, you know where to find me.
It was a great debate, or what I would more accurately say, a great discussion between Sye Ten Bruggencate and Justin Schieber. No moderator needed. Nice.
A new felt cap will please papa
1. Sweaters
Finally, how does it write? It's a medium nib but the line isn't as wide as I would have thought. It's definitely wider than the fine points (Japanese and Western) that I use, but it's not as sloppy as my Faber-Castell Ambition medium (which verges on broad). What also caught my attention was how slim the pen feels in my hand, it's not heavy yet it looks like it might have a bit of weight to it. The cap feels very light, so you don't even notice it.
I have been with my significant other, Eddie, for 17 1/2 years. We have been through a lot together. Yesterday his Dad Charlie passed away from pneumonia and other complications. He would have been 88 in October. My Dad's been gone since 1991, although it seems like yesterday.
I can’t wait to start running in them! I have to wait till Tuesday!! At least I can officially retire the asics. I can’t be too angry with them, they did get me through a half marathon, so I think I got my money’s worth out of them. Just a shame that I spent that much money on a shoe that was wrong for me. Oh well. As for the new pair, I’ve heard nothing but great things about Brooks. Heck, my half marathon running outfit is Brooks, and I’m happy with that! My love affair with New Balance will not end though, I have that pair arriving from Amazon. I’ll have to start running in both and decide which I will keep, and which will be my daily pair of sneakers.
For letting me
Time is the longest distance between two places-
"I would like to be made into a bomb and blow myself up amid the Israelis", one old man said.
Once you have completely let go, praise God.
Hay Rides
Ink: StazOn Black
I must confess to being a little surprised that there weren't more entries, but I'm going to chalk it up to the fact that I was overwhelmed by TLA the last 2 weeks and wasn't able to post a flurry of nagging reminders.
My girlfriend was stuck on her trusty battlebox army, 11 points consisting of Sorscha, Destroyer and Juggernaut. I went a little crazier with new models painted so I deployed Butcher, Destroyer, a min. unit of Man-o-War and the Widowmaker Marksman.
Neetz ;)
1. Their GM is John, the old GM from the downtown location, and our old Showdown bartender.
Unfortunately, I found Eleanor to be a hard character to figure out. At times she comes off as too naive (appropriate since she was raised in such seclusion) but then she's head strong in other situations. It just didn't jive with me and I never felt like I really knew her. Then there's her 'romance' with Edmund. This girl is so starved for attention and love that she immediately falls in love with literally the first man she spends any time with (not including her father and the creepy man who is entrusted to look after her following her father's death). I think their relationship was supposed to be a whirlwind romance but I just didn't feel it. Perhaps I'm dead inside. It felt silly to me but I have to remind myself that it is the 1600's and this girl didn't have any experience in the romance department. My point? I just didn't get butterflies in m'belly reading about their romance.
I haven't been at my computer the past few days. Mr D and I went to New York City on Friday (see photo below.) It was a great day; I always love spending the day with just him and getting out of the house. Too many days are spent on the couch!! We both start new jobs tomorrow, so it was nice to have a day to ourselves before new stresses start.
On the way, they met the Bat. They all had the same conversation with the Bat.
Back in the 80s we had a craft shop, selling my unfinished woodcrafts, and the hand painted pieces the Lady of the House did. Lots of hours spent there doing our thing with saws, brushes, drills, carving knives, sponges and buckets of wood sealer and stains.
stand of three trees will
This week's lesson went much better. I successfully drummed a rock beat and wept with pride (I've only known my poor teacher for a cumulative hour and he has already seen my entire range of emotion). Now I want everyone to know I'm a drummer. Carrying my drumsticks around in my purse and accidentally dropping them at parties is a good first step, but I think clipping a few old school band medals to my favorite black blazer would be even better.
11. Mona-Maiden of the Cancer Moon
*The first and most general thing I'll say is that this franchise is impressively cohesive, with a tight narrative continuity and a distinct, consistent visual style. The elements that repeat from movie to movie and the patterns that emerge coalesce into the building-blocks and contours of a compelling storyverse. And the way the final movie brings everything full-circle (not only with Dr. Gordon and the bathroom set, but even just letting us see the "reverse bear-trap" actually work for once) draws the seven Saws together as one grand long-form serial story in a way I don't think any other horror franchise has achieved or maybe even attempted.
Here is my layout of my youngest looking rather cute....
10. Salt Of The Earth 4:47
- Solstice, WikipediaAs the sun stands still, everything else seems to be in motion. Summer is in sway. The succession of insect emergences quickens its pace even as it near its end. Blooms seem to explode, with something new opening each day. Even so, the day after tomorrow will be shorter, the day after shorter still. The arc of gravity's rainbow is masked by this abundance. So we celebrate it, as we should.
Almost a year ago, and just 3 weeks after we lost Leroi, our King Charles Cavalier to diabetes, Lester had a seizure while hanging out on the front lawn. The Man immediately rushed him to the vet. The diagnosis we received sucked. He had a Stage 3 heart murmur and was in congestive heart failure. Due to his robust size…almost 14 pounds…his heart was working in over-drive to circulate his blood. As a result, fluid was collecting around his heart and in his belly, putting pressure on everything. What I thought was a seizure, what in actuality, a heart attack. Essentially, his heart was being squeezed and his breathing compromised. All because he liked to catch scraps more than he liked to exercise, bless his bones! The vet said he would be lucky to make it another year. Medication was prescribed, and he was sent home. We vowed to let him enjoy the time he had left. No holds barred
LOVE!!!
The balloons are made with a quickutz die and I have added Glossy onto them.
When we last left you, in Part I of the “Runaway Railroad/Paralegal Planner” series, you found yourself immersed in the paralegal twilight zone. What a fun place to be…right?! Your attorney, and others, commenced to running around the office like chickens with their heads cut off, you received about 7 random client calls in a row, you were told that the court clerk was holding on line 1 to schedule a conference, that deposition for tomorrow was just cancelled last minute, so you’d need to call the client to advise her not to show up, your co-worker walked in with a random question about how to perform a particular task, and there you sat, behind that big, wooden desk in that leather, executive chair with the crazy “my day is being torpedoed ” eyes, as the runaway railroad crashed through the center of your office, and whisked you away to…you guessed it…Crazy Town!
Here comes the "bad" word. (Although if you have read the book I'm pretty sure you're going to be okay with me saying it?)
So far, so idyllic. But change comes, and it's sudden and brutal. Lucy must cope with loss and with an undermining of her belief. And Lob must set off in search of a new home. As Lucy, in south London, longs for Lob to come to her, so Lob, walking the roads, feels a pull towards the south and follows it, despite setbacks and danger.
Solution: Try having more eggs (the yolks contain 35 micrograms of chromium each), cheese (16 micrograms per ounce), 100 per cent whole grain or rye breads (up to 12 micrograms per slice) and beer (up to 30 micrograms per 12 ounce glass). There you go guys…have more beer!!
Then I think about melting on top of the Haagen-Dazs ice cream. I think about fresh brown rice and that delectable earthy taste that flattens against my tongue like a lather of foody-goodliness. Warm toast crunching against the roof of my mouth, the way it tickles when warm butter, creamy and smooth . . .Okay, I’m getting a bit carried away.
Arrests are public information, but exactly how public should they be? Twitter is testing the limits. Every arrest in Denton, Texas, is chronicled on an unofficial twitter feed, built by an art student seeking to explore the possibilities opened by social platforms like twitter to share public information. The mugshot at left shows a woman arrested yesterday for assault causing bodily injury. She hasn't been tried or convicted. Should her photo be on twitter (or on change.org)? When Montgomery, Texas, District Attorney Brett Ligon threatened last week to post people arrested for driving under the influence on his twitter feed (he apparently hasn't started yet), some in the defense community balked at the idea of shaming people accused of crimes.
Progressive Majority Wisconsin believes values-centered campaigns are winning campaigns. That's how Progressive Majority succeeded in flipping control of the state senate in 2006. Kathleen Vinehout won because she thinks everyone deserves affordable health care. Jim Sullivan took a suburban Milwaukee district on the strength of his commitment to good public schools. John Lehman wants a government that cares about people instead of corporations - Racine agrees. Pat Kreitlow knows that people want and deserve a healthy environment. And Kim Hixson squeaked out a win, by focusing on the hopes of local voters. We will continue nurturing local candidates to build a deeply-rooted progressive coalition in the state. In addition, Wisconsin staff will focus on incumbent protection efforts for progressive candidates that will face tough re-election bids in 2008.
2. The Jukebox Guy: this guy is one of the most annoying in the bar. He will blockade himself at the jukebox and play absolutely terrible songs all night. He’s usually middle-aged, white and plays a lot of Warrant, Lynrd Skynrd, Styx mixed in with the occasional Eminem. After paying for about two hours worth of music, he will play a game of pool while dancing badly and lip-syncing to the music. Normally no women will go near him, unless they are passing him to get to the bathroom. This guy is fairly harmless, but he will always ruin the bar music. His drink of choice is Miller Lite and he’s to cheap to buy shots.
So what would it look like if we allowed the Lord’s Prayer to guide our prayers? I’d like to take this and the next couple of posts to explore that idea. My hope is that you won’t read these articles and agree with me, but that you will actually try this and share your experiences by posting a comment.
It all began with a brilliant azure box Natasha found while we were out shopping one day.
It went OK. I barely made my way past the fluorescent walls to a treadmill. And there was a moment of almost tears as I moved out of the way from the man that said to me, "If you want to gaze at yourself, you can use that mirror," as he shunned me to a corner. Hey Jordan Knight, I was just lifting free weights! Looking at yourself is acceptable! At the point all the "macho" French men knew I was the non-French girl.
For a base color I used Yolizul 786 (blue-purple duochrome) over Pure Ice French Kiss.
NEW: Blood Sausage – 1
I was irritated to hear my wife snort behind me. Deciding that there was little point in continuing the conversation I harrumphed and began walking away.
I grabbed the three oldest and off we went - to the Old City.
Now, your turn. Feel free to use dialogue "to show" as well. Here are the sentences. Have fun.
Create/Produce – The learner will create a 5-slide Knovo overview presentation and a 3 min video using Google Earth and iMovie to illustrate the virtual dream vacation. The presentation should have a title slide, travel technologist bio, recorded instructions for video submission and contact information. The iMovie video should be no longer than 5mins illustrating the virtual tour in Google Earth to the desired location. The video should include title slide, music, tour location recorded in Google Earth and two travel reviews.
in Belgium this month. Vintage 2009 was aged in foeder
Stephanopoulos: when do you get
Go to your doctor right away, no matter how odd you feel about it or how shy you are.
The Three Caballeros
Keep in mind that the high quality of our schools is what brings many people to Hingham. If they start leaving, home values will drop!
And even after all this while
That’s me. Have you read it? What do you think of it?
Frolic is a music festival held once a year with exciting live acts and dj’s from all over the country. In previous years we have seen the likes of The Dukes, Thomas Tantrum, Science of Eight Limbs, Montage Populaire, Arp Attack, Beans on Toast, Six Nation State and many more. It was originally created to promote local music and has now expanded.
It has meant getting up and out. It has meant jumping on the trampoline for an hour with my 5 y.o. instead of “working on the computer”. And let’s be honest here. “Working on the computer” is a never-ending to do for me. So an hour away is nothing.
“We believe that claims against the trustee are based on a misunderstanding of the limited role of the trustee in mortgage securitizations,” he said.
PS: Enjoy these vids
Jeans - Walmart
Oh, also, I've had a few people comment asking what kind of bun this is/is it a sock bun. Well, it's just my hair, in a high ponytail, wrapped around itself. :) Tutorial soon?
Those who are grieving will identify grievances wherever they look. They will say “life should not be how it is.”
I would have had to revise it soon anyway, because it contains links to my blogs. This one is obviously fine, but I have since moved the other from Tumblr over here to WordPress, so the link in the story is a dead end. That doesn’t look that professional. I want to make some formatting changes too – maybe tweak the characters just a little bit, and expand the story just slightly. My plan is to re-release it, as part of the “bundle book” I’ll describe below. And also to release an enhanced version of it, with a price on it. No more freebie story.
And there is something else about OFSTED that the general public does not know. This organisation has a habit of moving the goal posts when it comes to assessing the quality of teaching and learning. OFSTED has four "level descriptors": Outstanding, Good, Satisfactory and Inadequate. Well, lessons which may have been classed as Satisfactory by an inspector in one year, can be graded UNsatisfactory after the passage of time. I have been present at a meeting when an adviser has shown a video of a lesson graded Satisfactory in 2000, "but (said the cheery adviser) it wouldn't be now!". At another such meeting, we were told that the OFSTED grade of "Good" is now the new "Satisfactory". OFSTED, it seems, has the power to change the meanings of words, but we were not told what "Satisfactory" now meant. Imagine what would happen if the standards of bricklaying changed in the same way - would a wall that was "satisfactory" in 2005 have to be knocked down in 2011?
So is that the “dangerous method”? Getting involved with a patient? For Sabina it is an infatuation. For Jung this relationship enables him to fully embrace his sexual nature.
"My lifes better without her in it, ... on a cheerier note"
The French Concession draws a solid expat following and seems to be teaming with new restaurants and boutiques. Hidden up 3 stories lays a terrace restaurant, Mr. Willis, the homebase restaurant of celebrated chef Craig Willis.
Exercise is just as important to your mental health as it is to your physical health. It’s a stress reliever, a relaxant (although it may not feel like it at that moment), a rejuvenator. I’ve come to the point where the studies about mental health and exercise don’t matter to me anymore, because I know it works. I’m walking, talking proof. I challenge you to try it. On the days when you’re feeling down, or sad, or just don’t want to do anything. Get up, go outside, take a walk, or ride your bike, go to the local gym and sign up for their free trial (yes they’re out there, I used to “Gym hop” which is a fun way of saying I would go to whatever gym was offering a free trial and then move on to the next one so I would never have to pay for a gym membership. Sad I know, but have you seen a Social Worker’s salary?!?) and just see how you feel when you’re done. More than likely, you’re going to feel a ton better. Your body and your mind will thank you.
Directly following SebastiAn came Feed Me who absolutely destroyed the Sahara. My first time catching him and it exceeded my high expectations. Up next was the 17 year old French sensation Madeon, who I have to say looks like he is 13 years old, but I have huge respect for a kid this young playing in front of the massives at festivals such as this. The kid absolutely dominated and had the Sahara in a frenzy as everywhere I looked people just had the biggest smiles on the faces and were dancing their asses off.
There is a saying: Get your character up a tree, and then throw rocks at him or her when the character tries to climb down. That is pretty much what you have to do.
Junior Nation, let me preface the rest of this post by telling you that I am not going to bash your hero. That’s not my style. I can’t call myself The Unbiased Race Fan if I am going to throw a a bunch of biased statements at you about why I think Junior hasn’t won. I may pose some hard questions, and some hard statements… but it’s not in my nature to bash someone.
I've been working since I was 12, as soon as I could babysit, I was doing it. My family was low middle class, at least that's what I tell myself. I would babysit all summer, so that when school started I could buy my school clothes, mom bought my coat, and everything else was up to me.
It is full to the brim with all the bits that have been left from various car boots sales Alan has done and bags upon bags of clothing from when Milly was younger. I have been saying for the last two years that I will get on EBay and try to sell things but have always been put off...
We’ve all seen it before: the 2-yr-old is standing in the middle of the room screaming his head off. His face is red, his hands balled into comical little fists. His mother and I stare at him with a kind of exhausted paralysis. She looks at me and says flatly (and funnily), “Oh, the maternal ambivalence.” This takes place years before either of us was aware of We Need to Talk About Kevin, either book or film. Now I wish I’d seen the film with her — I can’t imagine how interesting our post-viewing debriefing could have been, how much more I could have learned from that conversation.
"YEAH KELLY....GO GIRL!"
Of course, this season is different, it always is. No matter what the other teams in the AL Central do,the Indians need to keep winning series after series. This is especially important within the division. Cleveland fans need to forget about the newly added second wildcard and remember the best way to bring October baseball to our fair city is by winning the division.
Dr Matthew Penn, of the National Solar Observatory in Arizona, said recently: ‘Because the sun is becoming more active, it will have an impact on millions of people. Sunspots can cause the biggest and most damaging space storms that occur.
an Emilyism: "I'm not crying, Mommy. That's just my boogers getting out."
And Martin Luther had “issues”??? Martin Luther was an Augustinian monk who had constipation, a bad attitude, and no intention of ever leaving his order, much less the Church. He just wanted reform. The Church cancelled HIS membership, Dan. This made him testy.
Girl - "Well because he told me in the text that he sent."
Don’t miss the opening words: “My son.” There are a couple of Greek words for son: one is “huios,” the more formal, legal term, the other “teknon,” a term of tender affection. Luke uses “teknon” to capture our Lord’s meaning. The father does not accept his firstborn’s rash disowning of the family; he loves his son starting from his address. Then he speaks of the grace of communion: “You are always with me.” And he labors on: “my property, my living, my very life, is yours for the sharing, and — isn’t this great! — that includes your found brother.” The father scorns all shame and will not be thwarted from seeking above all the restoration and peace of his family.
“The locals rave about this pizza. I’m not so impressed. It is very thick crust and greasy. No delivery or seating to speak of. I think the locals like it because they grew up with it. It must be an acquired taste that I’ve not acquired after 7-years in the Ohio Valley.” (Mosier, Oregon)
Somewhere in my research folder (aka the pile of papers stacked in my sewing room) is a September 2007 Vogue magazine article by Jean Hanff Korelitz titled “The Sloppy Syndrome.”
127Full in my view set all the bright abode,
Our chairs are already accounted for but I thought I'd throw the idea out there!
“Let’s play 9-ball,” requested Hank.
The answer: We get praised for how we think!
A man with a satchel (European handbag) or a man wearing Capri’s ….. at a Slayer concert …..
As Katie continued to sing, it occurred to me that we were at the point where this river was ending, and would soon flow into another. The sixth and youngest of her generation, hers would be the last of these occasions for many years. The next bat- or bar- mitzvah in our family would be for the child of one of these six.
Daisy Goodwin, chair of the judging panel
Again, no single being or beast comes to mind, but at the moment I’m preoccupied with Slavic Rusalki – the water-dwelling ghosts of girls who’ve died untimely or violent deaths – who will play a role in my next book.
I started cleaning them November of 2010!!!
- The plot was quite predictable.
For those who don't know what colcannon is, it's an Irish dish. It's mashed potatoes with onions and kale, sometimes cabbage instead of kale. The reason I always refused to it was because of the kale/cabbage and my whole "I don't eat that stuff" thing. We still had some kale from last week's CSA box and my husband REALLY wanted colcannon so I figured I'd indulge him. He wanted to make it but I have a feeling his wouldn't have been anywhere near as good. I looked in my cookbooks and found a good recipe in Gary Rhodes' New British Classics. Gary never disappoints and this time it was no exception. Of course, I didn't follow the recipe to the T, I did make changes that I think made it SO much better. The colcannon was definitely the star of the show but the protein was fish, and it was good too!
“If I had to say it again, I would say it differently, no doubt,” Harris tells the newspaper. “Those weren’t planned words, but what I do stand by is that the word of God makes it clear that effeminate behavior is ungodly. I’m not going to compromise on that.”
My little guy is going on nine and is already engaged in reading and talking (or should I say lecturing?) about environmental issues such as recycling, the oil spill, and alternative energy: if he could stand up in front of a group of people and give the impassioned speech he gave on the above-mentioned subjects to his carpool mate in the backseat on the way to school this morning, he could well get more people to start hounding Congress and private research entities for affordable clean alternatives. Yet I hesitated to get this book because of its frightening implications...
It is weird when you are injured for that long of a period of time. This is my first real “injury” ever– I might have fractured my pinky this summer which hurt for a bit but didn’t alter my daily life. I’ve broken a toe here and there and have been seriously sore and achey from trapeze but nothing lasting until this
1 absorbed
whose approaches you have so wantonly welcomed
5. Have her face a difficult decision, and then make the wrong choice; this will be misinterpreted as deep powerful storytelling.
This has allowed me to gradually sneak things onto his plate at dinner without him freaking out or refusing to try it. He's discovered a love for peas, broccoli, and corn on the cob. It's a start.
What do the consituents in Hendon think of their MP gallivanting around the world in this boys own fashion, courtesy of a scheme whose credibility Col Richard Kemp, former commander of British troops in Afghanistan, commented to Mrs Angry last year was 'undermined' by the practice of awarding its members medals and as he put it 'phoney' ranks? Ought he not to be concentrating on rather more boring but necessary constituency duties? And has anyone seen him out canvassing yet, with or without he who must not be named, ie the Tory candidate himself, Brian Coleman?
SPANAKORIZO
38. Despise You - We Won't Stop Cutting You
And in that moment,
Aside from that, it’s also partly pride that drives an MD jealous. Keith told me he gets jealous when I don’t pick him and when I take photos with other MDs. Is it because of pride? Tips and drinks? More? Could be either or all. I don’t really care at this point. All I know that whatever the motivations are, the wide open relationship even inside the confines of a gay bar has its kinks.
Sources tell me that former San Francisco 49ers and Detroit Lions head coach Steve Mariucci is interested in the Arkansas head coaching job. As of this morning, separate sources indicate to me that Arkansas AD Jeff Long has not spoken with Skip Holtz or Tommy Tuberville to this point. Yet another source tells me that New England Patriots offensive coordinator Josh McDaniels would be willing to talk if contacted by Long. There is no rush at all for Jeff Long. Although coaches can leave campus for spring recruiting next week, head coaches are not allowed on the road during the spring recruiting period.
We could have gone back to the Tudor place for tea, but were tempted away from Lichfield’s oldest to the town’s newest. Flamingo Tea Room in Tamworth Street only opened last November, but already has a good, loyal clientele among the locals. Not hard to see why: a great welcome, lovely cuppa (Suki Tea – all loose-leaf) and again some fantastic cakes and scones, all made in-house by Susan or Joan.
Thankfully the world is a big place, and while one market shudders or shrinks, another grows. Some of our authors make more money in Germany or Brazil than they do in the UK or US.
Today we're taking a break from paint, and talking hair! If there's one thing most girls have in common, it's the love/hate relationship we have with our hair. If you're like me, your hair saga goes something like this:
“So what shall I do with Jesus the so-called Messiah?” asked Pilate.
And, on top of this, I'd really like to start blogging again. Posts will probably be short and sweet again for a while, and maybe only here and there during the time that I start again, but I miss it. It's an outlet for creativity that I need- Not only posting, but taking some time to view all the great things everyone else completes.
7 Tin Pan Alley (Roughest Place in Town) 10:29
07. Beggars 4:11
Now be sure to let me know how the gathering goes and how the grass grows around you, and then join me soon for another walk on the wilder side of life.
These are the three choices I have been wavering with on our new journey. Unfortunately I am going under way more than I would like to admit. God is calling me to surrender and float. He has me under His wings, however again and again I try to do this in my strength. I try to make things look the way I want them. I want control and comfort. Yet really it is an illusion. I have no control of this situation just as it started. Sure I could have said no, but the Spirits conviction made it clear that in doing so would be sin. So I have to make the right choice, float.
That lasted until August 11, 2001. Just about 40 days after we met. And four months after that, on December 17, 2001, he proposed. One the beach. With roses. It was amazing.
If you read my blog regularly then you *sigh* probably have a little insight in to how my *kitchen brain* works
Next Time: Security
I made a stop start video the other day… I seem to have had a fleeting creative streak:
You left me in a train wreck
Oh yes it was.
Another lack of difference, in my opinion, is both parties failure to place the facilitation of the flow of commerce, capital, and credit at the top of their platforms. If both parties are so concerned about economic growth and social justice, they would clearly delineate their differences and put forward policies reflecting them.
Time to hide from the world for passion’s turn
Nor can subsequent compliance with the requirement excuse a party’s failure to comply in the first instance. As Justice Regalado explains in his works on the Revised Rules of Civil Procedure:
As mentioned in my previous post, we are still have a few things to talk about regarding stereotypes and discrimination. Today’s article review is looking at a pretty famous study that wants to see what happens when we fail to meet our gender’s stereotype.
Now here is where this part will involves all her surrounding friends, family, and loved ones.
I am never so weak as when I think I am strong.
Though I love them all. This first layout is my favorite because I LOVE the Goofy photo. Brendan was so mad at me for making him take the picture instead of heading for another ride!
READ YOUR LABELS! Be your own scientist! There are no real regulations on the words “green” and “natural” so our best defense is a good offense. Educate yourself on what NOT to buy and then go a hunting. Also keep in mind when you CONSUME a product that even though the content of that bottle may be a healthier solution, you are STILL consuming the packaging! And believe it or not there are home remedies one can implement as well.
It was an ordinary Thursday, gloomy, rainy...the kind of day that one might wanna stay home. But I decided to gather my youngin's and my momma and head to the DI Estuarium...fast forward to the trip home and I get the question...THE question...the one I'd been waiting for..."Can I hang out with THE FRIEND this Saturday?". It was an prickly on the neck kind of moment that slightly rose my blood pressure, but I calmly answered, "We'll talk about it later".
Who would have ever thought that such a beauty icon would be born with six toes! It just goes to show that … NOBODY IS PERFECT. We are only human after all.
There were many fascinating sounds and sights to see and hear but it was now time to meet the children and teachers at MES
Feeling a little frightened myself, I considered Babyboy. He really really needed a nap. Yet, I didn't want him to be frightened. For now the sounds in his dreams drowned out the storms surrounding him. I decided to wait outside his door. Within arms reach if he needed me. If the storm sounded too loudly, I'd let him know mommy was near.
I have been feeling completely crap the past couple of days. The flu hit me Thursday night, and I dragged myself to work Friday morning, but every time I coughed it felt like my brain was going to explode out my forehead. Ivana tells me this is because I have an infection in my upper sinus cavity as well as the flu.
- I like that it's very comfy. Actually it reminds me a lot of my belly belt that I have been wearing under my regular clothes to cover my tummy.
Each one certainly has its own personality. Some of them really say a lot about their creator I think as 8th grade students have their own mood changes, feelings and expressions from moment to moment these are almost the modern day "mood rings."
Finally found time to sew...I've been baking and baking and baking...and eating and eating and eating! I have been having a LOT of fun learning all about baking and making cakes in preparation for my daughter's birthday. I say to those around me that it's "in my blood", as my Grandmother was an avid baker. She passed away when my oldest daughter was just a baby, I was only around 20, during a tumultuous time in my family. Lots of conflict and disconnection that occurred due to events that happened long before I was born. All things happen for a reason and while the separation may have been necessary at the time, it leaves me wondering if my interest in baking somehow is inherent from my Grandmother. I would have liked to pick her brain of all her baking knowledge.
Baby don’t you know it’s a big world
On the day of the wedding, Ivy gave me this bag. I thought it was additional items and decor that she wanted me to set up, but she said: "No, that's for you!" I opened the bag and it was full of my Trader Joe's treats with a note saying: "Here's a lil' something for you from home!" I think one time when we were talking on the phone or exchanging emails, I told her that I miss Trader Joe's in the San Francisco bay area (that's where Ivy and Howard are from too).
Even better as well as the ballot places, there are guaranteed places for a bargain price of £50 – only £18 ish more than the ballot place. What a deal. I couldn’t refuse and got myself a place last night. A very different distance to the longer runs and needs different training. Need to figure that out next and what sort of time I want to try and aim for.
# Call a senior at work ‘Bastard’ while he is there at the same party.
So that’s a controlling bully who instigated a 7-year stand-off with the world’s largest broadcaster, 2 managers who have won nothing significant in their careers (one of whom many think fortunate to have his freedom) and the most flawed, pernicious man in the profession. Inspired choices all. Even Arséne Wenger, a man widely acknowledged to have ‘revolutionised’ the British game perplexingly contends with a more muted assessment. Indeed, his club’s early-season travails attracted all-too-cheerful calls for his head, with several quarters denouncing the quixotic Frenchman’s laudable frugality and loyalty to his footballing principles. Why, one may legitimately wonder, could this be?
When I wrote my last post, I was upset by the thought of parents giving their children "gifts" with strings attached. I was upset that these parents didn't seem to understand the concept of a gift. But the more I think about it, I understand that it's not about gifts. It's about power and control. It's about rights. Many adults seem to be fine with the idea that children do not have the right to own things. I imagine it's requires a similar justification that was used in the not-so-distant past to justify why women could not own property.
So well done to us and hugest congratulations all the top twenty challenges – what an awesome achievement. And a mahoosive thanks from all the Papertake DT to everybody who supports our challenge each week.
Perhaps I’m a Tin Man.
. . . he calls bananas "bee-gahs". i'm not sure when they went from being "bays" to "bee-gahs", but it happened. and it's hilarious. he comes downstairs and immediately runs to the kitchen island, points to his beloved bananas and yells "bee-gah, peas!"
8. The forcefulness of simplicity.
All my pocket bears are all made to my own design and I write little poems to go in their bags with them. The smallest ones are often given with a greetings card. I started with a worry bear and, over the years, as requests came in, I now have little poems to suit all sorts of occasions. The easiest way is for me just to list the poems so here goes...
Oh, and there’s also the idea that stopping communication is inherently mean. In fact, I find that ignoring someone is the best way to prevent Internet Drama (something I simply won’t tolerate) and to prevent escalation. It doesn’t surprise me that it would never occur to Mr. Malcom that liberals may shut down conversation as a way of actually maintaining some semblance of civility.
I'm just so happy that it didn't end on a cliffhanger! There have been so many of those in YA fiction lately that it's getting harder and harder to keep track of them (and not want to cry) as we wait for the next book. The ending of Masquerade isn't one of those, but it still leaves me wanting to know what's going to happen. And that's how they should be. :)
Then again, when I’m short on sleep and Chloe pops up at the foot of the bed at 2:00 AM wanting to discuss the whichness of what or how to unscrew the inscrutable, I am sometimes less than delighted to engage with her. Kill or die? Sure. Lose sleep to help her distill her thoughts about some concept she’s been digesting? Well, shit!, I dunno about that. Losing sleep to review some thought process I ran to completion in my own mind a half a century ago because it’s new to her… Well, that’s an expression of love, too.
I am astonished that you are so quickly deserting him who called you in the grace of Christ and are turning to a different gospel— not that there is another one, but there are some who trouble you and want to distort the gospel of Christ. But even if we or an angel from heaven should preach to you a gospel contrary to the one we preached to you, let him be accursed. As we have said before, so now I say again: If anyone is preaching to you a gospel contrary to the one you received, let him be accursed. For am I now seeking the approval of man, or of God? Or am I trying to please man? If I were still trying to please man, I would not be a servant of Christ.
You can read a great description of what being “Free Range” means here, by Lenore Skenazy, who has been a strong advocate of this type of parenting. And as time goes on, I am sure I will write more about what being Free Range means to me and my family, but for now, back to my pet peeve.
“Your Excellency, as you embark on the new and difficult task of consolidating the political and economic system in Cuba, please be assured of the continued support of the people of South Africa in this regard.
x x x x
I want to kick off this week’s column by wishing a happy birthday to Carl Bradford, who has been a RIOC bus operator since 1979. We thank Carl, who celebrated his birthday last week, for his many years of service and continued hard work.
As sad as I am that my Little girl is growing up so fast...I'm am so beyond proud of her and excited for the years to come. I look forward to the girl she grows into and the many more memories we can make. Being a mom is such a blessing.... :)
One of the things that’s often missing in fiction, especially post-apocalyptic fiction, is the strong friendship bonds that exist among people. Often the survivors are not really friends, but people just thrown together that barely get along. In AS THE WORLD DIES, I enjoyed portraying various types of friendship bonds. There are best buddies, Juan and Travis, BFFs Ken and Lenore, and Jenni and Katie’s strong, sisterly friendship.
Whatever happened to you, I didn’t do it to you. You can’t go through people to make you better. You have to deal with it before you get into another relationship.
...that special holiday when the pilgrims ate brie en croute.
2) A female character who kicks too much butt
The takeaway: Consumers’ perceived safety nets are often full of holes. Many funding sources they reference would not cover living expenses for an extended period. What’s more, most people don’t understand their disability insurance coverage—or even know if they have any.
But, it does seem unavoidable that the threat of radical Islam will not be one of the big issues for some time yet. Whilst Islam seems to be in the news most days, the mainstream media isn’t yet ready to accept that the Government could have a hand in tackling the problems that we face. Part of the reason for this is that levelling criticism directly at one subset of the population is fraught with difficulties. Until the political establishment (not just in the UK) makes it clear that it seriously acknowledges the threat that radical Islam poses, we cannot expect the media to follow.
The City of Fayetteville reserves the right to request additional information as needed to process this
Form the cheese into a log or ball, pinching it closed underneath. Put cheese into an ice bath for about 20 minutes to firm up and – voila! You have cheese!!!!!
Uncertain in relationships. This is one I don't relate to. I've only entered into relationships where I was certain of my partner's feelings for me. If I didn't feel that closeness, I skipped having a relationship altogether. Probably because I enjoy being alone.
I'm sorry to hear that this day has been so difficult for you but am glad to know that the surgery went well. I'm really sorry to hear about your refrigerator! What a mess. It seems as if life can never go smoothly. I hope you were able to rescue most of your perishables and that this is the last of the drama for a while.
The study of sexual abuse of minors by Catholic priests and deacons resulting in this report was authorized and paid for by the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops (USCCB) pursuant to the Charter for the Protection of Children and Young People (Charter) adopted by the USCCB at its June 2002 meeting. The Charter called for many responses to this victimization of minors within the Catholic Church.
That being said though, whatever doubt Daniel might have had with Emily’s love for him didn’t seem to last that long. He was about to do something stupid before Mr Brooks stopped him and he did seem to instantly regret losing his temper with Emily as well. It’s also Emily who may make or break him on the witness stand as well, given that she’s next in line to speak at the trial.
Knowing when they last erupted and what they are doing today can help give the citizens of the west coast peace of mind in their daily lives.
Yep, Inge had a rather special Birthday with lots of lovely celebrations including a fab afternoon tea at the Cottage courtesy of her lovely Daughter Betty.
From this:
The lyrics to this song - btw - have had special meaning for me for as long as I can remember. I can think back to being with my "big sister" Kate in San Francisco listening to it as we drove along the coast. Great memories.
Here are other articles and news you may be interested in:
1 excitement
In short, I'm the kind of lazy that knows exactly how much work is 'enough' and does that and no more (this, by the way, is the most efficient way to live; see the start of Terry Pratchett's 'Moving Pictures' for a more detailed discussion). This works great whenever there's a clear 'enough'.
would be greedy at best.
I don't have time to worry about the creep sitting in 13C who slipped a note in my purse. I have to find my daughter's missing bag before this ruins our vacation.
In the years since, I’ve occasionally battled with the women in my office on this subject. One argument I thought should be convincing was that we should keep it cooler because, while they can always put more clothes on, I can’t be taking more clothes off. Well, I can, but I’m sure it would mean a rather unpleasant visit with the human resources guy. One lady showed up on a July morning last year wearing a sleeveless sundress to work, and immediately began complaining how cold the air-conditioning was. “Have you considered wearing something that covered the upper half of your torso?” I countered.
(Should be noted that the novel’s basis is around the neuroscience understanding at the time it was written combined with a look at where future trends were headed. It’s not born of pure fluffy imagination. The concepts are centered around current theory).
Every time I heard that, I would ask the young person (normally a guy) to show me his voter registration and military ID.
1 renewed
Two things amazing about this article. Firstly that it appeared on one of the most read South African news websites, News24 - these types of stories (black on white crime) are usually ignored/bleached by the MSM and are left to the smaller non-English newspapers to report. The other amazing thing is that all 3 victims survived - the norm in South Africa is that the black ciminals brutally murder their crime victims after they've been sufficiently tortured. One can only speculate why they were left to survive, but it may have to do with the possibility that one of the criminals worked for the family and maybe felt some remorse? Not likely, but at least they weren't murdered - there are small mercies to be grateful for....
The one on Johns Hopkins Road became Facci Ristorante. This week, the Clarksville location has changed its name to Anthony's -- as shown in the photo that Dave sent me. Now Gianni has left a comment raving about the Italian wines at Facci and saying that the hostess there said the Pasta Blitz in Glenwood will take on a new menu and name as Vittorio.
Now if you’re done laughing, you’ve had your chance to get your jollies, please help me out here.
A thousand thoughts a thousand fears. A worried glance as the incident nears.
I made a trip down to get a set of Thank-You cards requested by my juniors printed, and I didn’t have much time from preparation to printing so the final design was slightly compromised.
Volatile informs the compiler that the value of the variable can change from the outside, without any update done by the code.
03 Ambition
If you are Danish, please write your newspaper and your member of parliament and insist on this kind of response.
Two-thirds of the group said they had tried to lose weight in the previous year through a variety of diets.
RND 19: *sc in first 2 st, dec over next 2 st*, repeat around (18 stitches)
It's so easy to forget them, for it was so long ago, that our Bobs, Jims and Larrys went to battle, that we know.
Roland TB-808 (26-02-2001) - Includes producer Arthur Baker, plus Ray Keith talks about the importance of the bass.
With Mother's Day just around the corner I thought a pretty little
Law and Caesar are talking
Another great turnout last week full of inspiration. So many of you have started your fall decorating and for some reason I am just not there yet. I am sure some little spark will ignite in me soon. I really need to get back to some projects that need to be done to this house that I have put off for months. Hopefully with cooler temps soon I will feel like doing them.
And come to think of it, I would want my kids, to grow up, to not want the shade red in their lives.
One Stockton baby has a huge following because of a serious health problem. Turns out social media saved his life.
I don't actually think the Dragon goes with the castle, but it's a dragon, castles a dragon - kids don't care.
So, what was all the hassle documented below: well, I'm going to choose to believe that it's simply a misunderstanding and that, given the car is quite old now it's just not clear how to handle these kinds of issues. Thankfully this one guy did listen to me and did some research and found that something could be done. And I'm very grateful for his patience and the time he spent on this.
And the mere thought of it, moistened his face with trickles of salty water.
There's no exact say on the theme yet, but that's what I strongly assume it would be.
This sale is for a Beige/Carmel colored chair, see main picture. FREE handheld dolphin massager while supplies last value, free offer starts 3-17-11 Our most desired chair, everything you need and want and some for less.
This is how the site looks like.. :)
MARKETS GENERALLY QUIET.
This year has not been like that at all. The weather has been amazing. The sky blue and the water turquoise. We have been making the most of it and getting to the beach as often as we can, as we know that it may not last.
There are no special features. (Alliance Films)
Therefore God has had to give another new law, one that is not so hard and that the world can keep, and this law is the Koran. But if anyone asks why he does no miracles to confirm this new law, he says that that is unnecessary and of no use, for people had many miracles before, when Moses’ law and the Gospel arose, and did not believe. Therefore his Koran did not need to be confirmed by wasted miracles, but by the sword, which is more effective than miracles. Thus it has been, and still is the case among the Turks, that everything is done with the sword, instead of with miracles.
If you visit Ho Chi Minh City, you can’t skip Ben Thanh Market even if you know that it’s going to be a typical tourist site. Ben Thanh Market is crazy, noisy, vibrant, energetic, crowded, and above all, interesting! You have to negotiate for prices, which is not easy if you are not familiar with the pricing in Vietnam and I tell you this, they are so used to tourists, they are tough to bargain with. When the time is pressing, it can be stressful, so make sure you give it enough time and go there relaxed and just enjoy shopping and browsing alleys after alleys filled with Vietnamese goodies.
The simple, yet oh so very complicated answer is because He is worth it all.
Today was pretty disillusioning to be honest.
UCR is ranked 41st among top public universities (US News and World Report 2011) and is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer, with a commitment to workforce diversity.
All systems are go.
‘Interesting. But what if the rules changed?’ the other one mused, and began a complex gambit to make the rules change. As they watched, the gambit dissolved harmlessly into confusion.
Tonight the Cherub has gone off to stay with a pal for a couple of days.
After the crash, several of Hood’s former Marine cohorts gathered at the farm and began to take in crash survivors. The community had expanded to the point where it was somewhat difficult to maintain. They had no real problem with disease or violence inside the camp, but they had started to see a sharp up-tick in people leaving the nearby cities.
Measuring beaker
The fact of the matter is I simply identify more with the characters in YA novels than I do with those in “adult” books. The way I see it, they’re called Young Adult for a reason; if I’m not a young adult at twenty-three, then what am I? If I have to choose between books written about the middle-aged and those about teenagers, I’m almost certainly going to identify more with a seventeen-year-old protagonist than one who is forty-three. Maybe there’s a niche market out there full of books written for the college-aged, but if so I’ve yet to find it. (Note: This excludes the majority of 19th-century novels, as they were the highlight of my collegiate career.)
If you head on over to Bryn Mawr this weekend, you can partake in the festivities and try to redeem this free dinner card. If you are unable to travel the distance, you can always celebrate May Day at home via Sepia Saturday.
Because of this, I drank plenty of water, checked my phone, and pretended nothing horrid happened like that. But it was really hard, everything in my dream just felt like seconds ago although I’ve had it in the past hour *drink drink drink. I wondered how long it has been since I stopped praying before I sleep. Plus, the fact that I wasn’t able to attend mass last Christmas day. Maybe this is a strong cue with all that.
Talked with Tim, our lawyer, he says he’d buy some corn. Some of the guys at General Fabricators would as well. Keith and Bruce too at S&S. We’ll see, I’d like to be harvesting enough to sell to some of our local stores instead of just to people on the side of the road. However, I probably would make more money continuing to sell by the road. Stores have to mark it up and maybe it’s not worth all that trouble, volume isn’t everything.
T. Francis Glasson
Now let’s add what we know about each of the suits in the Tarot…
Eventually, she got used to the grooming, and now even enjoys it! As with everything; always be persistent, and always respect your cats wishes. Persuade her that it’s for the best!
The ideas would fly from her four-year old brain to her tiny little hands
But I love somebody new
7. Your dream last night? quest
17 - Ambition is a poor excuse for not having enough sense to be lazy.
125g caster sugar
Sensory data:
“I’d swear you’re psychic. Yes! I have to meet this honey down the street at Bumpsies in half an hour and I thought I’d better get some tips from the master.”
